[Bone scintigraphy in suspected fracture of the scaphoid bone].Skeletal scintigraphy of the wrist in suggested scaphoid fracture.Skeletal scintigraphy was performed in 187 patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture but with normal radiographic findings. In 85 patients focally moderately (12 patients) or markedly to intensely (73 patients) increased radionuclide uptake was seen, over either the distal radius or carpal bones. A fracture corresponding to markedly increased uptake was eventually verified in 15 out of 26 patients in the distal radius, in 21 out of 28 in the scaphoid but in only 6 out of 18 in other carpal bones. One fracture of the body and one of the hook of the hamate were found, one fracture of the capitate and three of the triquetrum. Not a single fracture was verified in 10 patients with markedly, often intensely, increased activity over the trapezium/trapezoid. It is concluded that scintigraphy is of value in carpal trauma not only to exclude scaphoid fracture but also to direct the attention to the possibility of other carpal fractures, otherwise usually missed.Clinical utility of tomosynthesis in suspected scaphoid fracture. A pilot study.Radiography alone will not detect all scaphoid fractures. There is a reported prevalence between 9 and 33% of occult scaphoid fractures. The evidence-based literature suggests that magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the most suitable secondary imaging modality due to the ability to evaluate the bone marrow directly and to also identify other injuries. However, there is no consensus on the choice of follow-up imaging strategy-computed tomography, MRI, or bone scan-across different institutions. Tomosynthesis is a new digital tomographic method creating multiple thin tomographic sections. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the clinical utility of tomosynthesis in suspected occult fracture.Thirty-five patients with a clinically suspected occult scaphoid fracture after initial normal radiography were imaged with repeat radiography and tomosynthesis scan 2 weeks after trauma.Repeat radiography revealed one previously undetected scaphoid tubercle avulsion and one scaphoid waist fracture, confirmed by tomosynthesis. Tomosynthesis revealed two additional scaphoid waist fractures. In total, three initially occult scaphoid waist fractures were detected (9%). No additional fractures were detected in the remaining 32 patients during a 1-year follow-up.Tomosynthesis can demonstrate occult scaphoid fractures not visible at radiography.Investigation of computed tomographic scan concurrent criterion validity in doubtful scaphoid fracture of the wrist.Rapid diagnosis of scaphoid bone fracture in the wrist is important so that appropriate treatment can be started. If a fracture is clinically suspected without being visible on radiography, further investigation has to be conducted to reveal a fracture or to rule it out. The objective of this study was to investigate the validity of computed tomographic (CT) scanning and bone scintigraphy compared with the clinical fracture rate during follow-up of 1 year for examining patients with a suspected scaphoid fracture.Bone scintigraphy and CT scanning were performed in 29 patients with persistent clinical suspicion of a scaphoid bone fracture 5 to 10 days after trauma.The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the CT scan were 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of bone scintigraphy were 78%, 90%, 78%, and 90%, respectively. Seven patients showed a fracture on both CT scanning and bone scintigraphy. Eighteen patients showed no fracture on both CT scanning and bone scintigraphy. A false-positive bone scintigram showed up in two patients and a false-negative bone scintigram in another two patients.CT scanning is a rapid, simple, valid method for demonstrating or ruling out a scaphoid fracture and is superior to bone scintigraphy.Use of early magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of occult scaphoid fractures: the CAST Study (Canberra Area Scaphoid Trial).To establish the effectiveness of early magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture in patients with suggestive clinical findings (but a normal initial X-ray) in an Australian major-referral emergency departmentA prospective study of patients who presented within 24 hours after trauma with clinical findings suggestive of a scaphoid fracture but no evidence of fracture on the initial X-ray. MRI was performed within 24 hours of presentation. Clinical review in patients with normal initial MRI was carried out in 10 days and repeat MRI was carried out when clinically indicated.A total of 22 patients were enrolled. Early MRI within 24 hours revealed 6 scaphoid fractures, 2 distal radial fractures and a hamate fracture. Thirteen patients had no fracture on the initial MRI. Upon clinical review in 10 days, 5 of these patients were clinically cleared and discharged. Eight of these patients underwent repeat MRI none of which revealed a fracture.In an Australian tertiary hospital with MRI facility, the early use of MRI is a sensitive and practical way to diagnose occult scaphoid fractures and saves unnecessary immobilisation.Outcome of routine bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.Undisplaced scaphoid fractures are easily missed on conventional scaphoid radiographs, but these occult fractures may seriously impair hand function. Routine bone scintigraphy (BS) is often advocated if there are clinical signs of a scaphoid fracture without radiological evidence. However, the results require careful therapeutic management.To determine the diagnostic value of BS in daily practice for clinically suspected scaphoid fractures.We evaluated our protocol of routine BS in suspected scaphoid fractures.In a retrospective study, we analysed 111 consecutive cases with signs of a scaphoid fracture on physical examination. Radiographs revealed 55 fractures, the remaining 56 patients all underwent BS.On average, the BS was performed after 4 days. It showed a fracture in 38/56 of the patients. The distribution of fractures was: scaphoid bone 15, distal radius 11, other carpal bones 9 and metacarpal bones 3.If there is a strong clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture, which cannot be confirmed by conventional radiology, BS is a valuable diagnostic tool.Bone scintigraphy in the management of X-ray-negative potential scaphoid fractures.One hundred and eleven patients with signs and symptoms of carpal scaphoid injury, but with no fracture visible on X-ray, underwent bone scintigraphy of the wrists. The first 42 patients were re-X-rayed 10 days after injury: bone scanning had identified all fractures confirmed on this X-ray; there were no false negative bone scans. Sixty-seven patients (60%) did not have increased focal uptake over the scaphoid or distal radius, and were mobilised immediately. None of these had a fracture at follow up. Twenty-nine patients with increased uptake over the scaphoid area (26%) remained in plaster of Paris for 6 weeks. All of these had clinical signs of a scaphoid injury. Bone scanning is a practical investigation for all X-ray-negative potential scaphoid injuries, and is acceptable to patient and clinician. In the presence of a normal scan, the practice of re-X-raying patients 10 days after injury may be abandoned.MR imaging of clinically suspected scaphoid fractures.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in revealing occult fractures in patients with clinically suspected acute scaphoid fractures who have normal or equivocal findings on radiographs.Thirty-six patients underwent MR imaging within 7 days of wrist injury. All had physical findings suggestive of scaphoid fracture. Coronal T1-weighted, short inversion time inversion recovery, and either T2-weighted or proton density-weighted fast spin-echo sequences with fat suppression were used. Follow-up radiographs were obtained at least 2 weeks after MR imaging whenever possible. All imaging studies were reviewed by two musculoskeletal radiologists.MR imaging revealed 22 occult fractures in 20 patients. Thirteen of these 22 fractures were in the scaphoid bone, and nine were in the distal radius. On MR images, 16 patients had no evidence of fracture. Follow-up radiographs were available in 14 of the 20 patients who had occult fracture revealed by MR imaging. Eleven of the 13 occult fractures of the scaphoid bone were followed up (two were lost to follow-up), and 10 of the 11 showed signs of healing. Five of the nine lesions of the distal radius were followed up, and three of these showed evidence of healing fracture. Three patients without MR evidence of a fracture had follow-up radiographs that showed no fracture. Three patients had findings consistent with bone contusion on MR images; in two patients, the contusion was associated with other fractures, and in one patient, the contusion was isolated.MR imaging can reveal occult wrist fractures when findings on radiographs are normal or equivocal.A comparison of bone scintigraphy and MRI in the early diagnosis of the occult scaphoid waist fracture.To determine the accuracy of MRI in the assessment of the radiographically occult scaphoid fracture.This prospective study compared the sensitivity and specificity of MRI for detection of radiographically occult scaphoid fractures with bone scintigraphy (BS), the currently accepted imaging modality of choice. Consecutive patients with clinical signs of a scaphoid injury but no evidence of fracture on plain radiographs at presentation and after 7-10 days were evaluated by MRI and BS. All images were reported in masked fashion and the sensitivities and specificities of the imaging modalities determined. All patients with a scaphoid fracture demonstrated by MRI or BS were followed for at least a year after injury.Forty-three subjects (aged 12-74 years) had both MRI and BS carried out on average 19 days from the injury date.Six patients (14%) had scaphoid waist fractures. There were other bony injuries in a further six. In 40 patients there was agreement between the BS and MRI findings. In three cases there was discrepancy between the imaging modalities; in all three MRI was found to be the more sensitive and specific. MRI could become the investigation of choice for this injury.[Imaging diagnostics of the wrist: MRI and Arthrography/Arthro-CT].To evaluate the use of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) compared with arthrography and arthro-CT (AG/ACT) in patients with wrist pain.MRI and arthrography/arthro-CT (AG/ACT) of the wrist joint were retrospectively evaluated in 346 patients over a three-year period. Imaging findings were correlated to surgical results (n = 78) or clinical course in an at least 6-month follow-up.For tears of the triangular fibrocartilage, arthrography, arthro-CT, and MRI demonstrated a sensitivity and specificity of more than 0.96. Only the positive predictive value was superior for arthrography/arthro-CT (0.99 and 0.98, respectively) compared with MRI (0.94). Arthrography was superior for functional diagnosis of scapho-lunate ligament tears (n = 25). Ulno-lunate and ulno-triquetral ligament defects were demonstrated more exactly by arthrography. Traumatic osseous defects, particularly scaphoid fractures (n = 33) and avascular necrosis (n = 17), were better diagnosed using MRI.For suspected lesions of the triangular fibrocartilage complex, AG/ACT is slightly more reliable than MRI. However, MRI was found to be highly accurate in diagnosing TFC tears, and is superior to AG/ACT in detecting traumatic and vascular lesions of the wrist.Computed tomography of suspected scaphoid fractures.Computed tomography (CT) can be used to triage suspected scaphoid fractures. This study assessed intraobserver and interobserver reliability and positive and negative predictive values of CT for the diagnosis of a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture.Eight observers evaluated CT scans from 30 patients (13 with nondisplaced scaphoid fractures, 17 with no scaphoid fractures) for the presence or absence of a fracture. Five observers evaluated the scans a second time. Statistical analyses included intraobserver and interobserver reliability and diagnostic characteristics.Computed tomography had substantial intraobserver and interobserver reliability for the diagnosis of a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture. The average sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT for a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture were 89%, 91%, and 90% for the first round and 97%, 85%, and 88% for the second round of observations, respectively. Based on an estimated prevalence of 5% true fractures among patients with suspected scaphoid fractures, the average positive predictive value for the detection of radiographically occult scaphoid fractures with tomography of the wrist was 0.28. The average negative predictive value was 0.99.Computed tomography should be used with caution for triage of nondisplaced scaphoid fractures because false-positive results occur, perhaps from misinterpretation of vascular foraminae or other normal lines in the scaphoid. Given the relative infrequency of true fractures among patients with suspected scaphoid fractures, CT is better for ruling out a fracture than for ruling one in.CT of the wrist in suspected scaphoid fracture.Bone scan and sagittal projection CT of the scaphoid was performed in 10 patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fractures. The primary and follow-up plain radiographs were negative or equivocal for fracture. CT examination demonstrated scaphoid fracture in 7 patients and normal findings in 3. It is concluded that CT of the scaphoid can replace bone scan to diagnose or rule out fracture in institutions where nuclear medicine facilities are not available.[Possibilities of scintigraphy in the early diagnosis of fracture of the scaphoid bone in the hand].Early computerized tomography accurately determines the presence or absence of scaphoid and other fractures.To validate the use of early CT in predicting scaphoid fracture and other fractures in patients with suspected scaphoid fracture.A prospective observational study of adult patients with a diagnosis of clinical scaphoid fracture presenting to a regional ED. Patients were immobilized in a scaphoid plaster and had a CT (wrist and carpals) same or next day. The gold standard used was the diagnosis on Day 10 with clinical examination and X-rays, with MRI performed in patients with persistent tenderness but normal X-rays.Forty-seven patients completed the study protocol from September 2004 until February 2006. For all fractures, early CT had a 96.8% negative predictive value and 100% positive predictive value (94.4% sensitive, 100% specific). No scaphoid fracture was missed by early CT. One patient had a trapezium fracture on CT, with a coexistent subtle capitate fracture only detected on MRI.Early CT scans show promise in the diagnosis of scaphoid and other fractures of the wrist and carpals. Further study is warranted to validate early CT in clinical scaphoid fracture as an alternative to other early advanced imaging, or plaster immobilization and 2 week review.[Value of bone scintigraphy in the recognition of scaphoid bone fracture difficult to detect roentgenologically].Fractures result in increased metabolism of the bone and increased uptake of certain radioisotopes as demonstrated by bone scanning. By comparison, X-rays reveal a fracture only by a disturbance in skeletal structure. In this study, scaphoid fractures which were difficult to detect initially on X-rays were demonstrated by bone scan eight days later. The value of this diagnostic technique was demonstrated in several cases.[MRI scanning in suspected fractures of the scaphoid bone].MR examination was performed in 20 patients clinically suspected of having a fracture of the scaphoid bone. The patients also followed the normal routine with conventional radiographs in the acute fase and after 10-12 days. The MR was in most cases performed within a day after the trauma. All fractures seen on conventional radiographs were depicted on MR. MR further showed four fractures, five bone contusions (bone bruise) and lesions of the soft tissues in 75% of the patients. In patients with suspected fracture of the scaphoid, MR seems to be the best primary imaging method and displays a wide range of lesions.Magnetic resonance imaging of suspected scaphoid fractures using a low field dedicated extremity MR system.To determine whether magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) using a dedicated extremity system could be utilized for the routine assessment of patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture, and to determine the most cost-effective timing of MRI for these patients.MRI of the wrist using a 0.2T extremity MR system was performed in two groups of patients. Fifty-six patients were examined within 4 days of injury and 53 with persistent symptoms at 10 days to 6 weeks following injury. A scaphoid series of radiographs was negative in both groups.The early MR group had seven scaphoid, six radial and four other fractures. Management was altered in 89%. The late MR group had 14 scaphoid, nine radial and three other fractures. Management was altered in 69%. A cost model showed that overall costs are less with early rather than late scanning.MRI of the wrist when scaphoid fracture is suspected can be undertaken in all patients with negative radiographs and could be performed in most departments with an MRI machine. There are significant patient benefits and overall costs would change little from conventional practice.Bone scanning in the assessment of fractures of the scaphoid.[Contribution of quantitative radio-scintigraphy to diagnosis of wrist injuries undetected on plain films: a prospective study of 154 cases].Fractures of the scaphoid must be diagnosed quickly to avoid persistent nonunion and the risk of osteoarthritis. Despite meticulous physical examination and adequate x-ray detection, numerous occult fractures still go unrecognized. The aim of this prospective study was to analyze the pertinence of quantitative radio-scintigraphy (QRS) presently used for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures.Quantitative radio-scintigraphy (QRS) is a new imaging technique associating quantitative bone scan and numerical fusion between bone scan images and x-ray images. We conducted a prospective study between November 1994 and March 1999 to evaluate the pertinence of this examination technique for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures in patients presenting clinical symptoms suggestive of wrist fracture but whose plain x-rays were initially considered normal. Further some patients had several series of plain x-rays performed at several week intervals in order to search for fractures becoming progressively visible on plain x-rays. After the QRS data was acquired, these patients' x-rays were reviewed again. We also compared the cost of QRS, repeated x-rays, bone scan and MRI at the Besançon University Hospital.QRS was performed in all 154 patients and revealed 61 fractures (56 single-line and 5 multiple-line fractures). Thus 43.5% of these patients had occult wrist fractures (41% of which involved the carpal scaphoid).Occult fracture of the wrist, particularly the carpal scaphoid, is frequent. Repeated x-ray examination does not increase the rate of detection of these fractures. Bone scans may also fail to reveal occult fractures. MRI is a key examination in the assessment of wrist fracture symptoms, but is presently not available in all institutions. Bone scan is classically insufficiently precise. QRS is a rapidly available low-cost examination which we have found to be indispensable for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures. With early QRS diagnosis, the risk of neglected carpal scaphoid fracture and subsequent nonunion and osteoarthritis together with the personal, social, and medicolegal consequences can be avoided.Determining the presence of scaphoid fracture with a day 4 bone scan.MRI diagnosis of fracture of the scaphoid bone: impact of a new practice where the images are read by radiographers.To investigate whether magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) radiographers are able to evaluate MRI examinations with regard to scaphoid fractures to save patients unnecessary immobilization and clinical and radiographic examinations, and to reduce the costs for the hospital as well as society in general.Over a 1-year period 224 consecutive patients with a suspected clinical scaphoid fracture but negative radiography were referred for MRI and examined within 11 hours. The MR images were primarily evaluated by the MRI radiographer on duty. Other fractures and bone edema were not reported because these were not part of the work-up protocol agreed upon by the radiology and the orthopedic departments. The following weekday a final report was provided by a radiologist. For the economical analysis the official price-list for Danish hospital service was used.The MRI radiographers reported 43 scaphoid fractures, whereas the radiologist ultimately diagnosed only 36 scaphoid fractures (16.1% of patients) (sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 96.3%). Six of the seven false-positive fractures occurred in patients with edema of the scaphoid. The seventh false-positive was a fracture of the capitate. The hospital saved at least 20,000 and the social care system 70.000.It is possible to provide an acute MRI service to patients with clinically suspected fracture of the scaphoid and a normal plain radiograph. The MR images can be primarily read by sufficiently trained MR radiographers. This new work-up protocol reduces the cost for society.Diagnosis of scaphoid fracture and dedicated extremity MRI.We evaluated the value of dedicated extremity magnetic resonance imaging (E-MRI) in patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture and normal initial radiographs. 52 patients underwent E-MRI within a mean of 4 (2-10) days after trauma. Follow-up radiographs were performed at average 11 (8-14) weeks after trauma, and these images were used as the "gold standard". A T1-weighted turbo gradient echo 3D and a tau short inversion recovery STIR were performed, both in coronal planes. The imaging time was less than 10 min. The images were evaluated independently by two radiologists. E-MRI detected occult fractures of the scaphoid in 9 patients, and of the distal radius in a further 6 patients. All these fractures were confirmed at follow-up radiographs. Furthermore, E-MRI revealed a fracture of the capitate bone in 1 patient, and of the triquetrum in 2 patients, and in 8 patients, bone bruise in 1 or more of the carpal bones. However, these fractures and bone lesions could not be confirmed by the follow-up radiographs. The agreement between the two examiners was high (kappa = 0.8) for E-MRI detection of fractures. E-MRI seems to be better than radiographs in the early diagnosis of occult fractures of the scaphoid bone and the wrist.Clinically suspected scaphoid fracture: a comparison of magnetic resonance imaging and bone scintigraphy.59 patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fracture, but negative radiographs at presentation and review, were examined by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and bone scintigraphy (BS). The diagnoses were compared with subsequent follow-up. There were four scaphoid fractures, 10 other fractures and three significant ligamentous injuries. All scaphoid fractures were identified by MRI and BS. MRI showed better interobserver agreement for scaphoid injury than BS and fewer false positive reports. Significant ligamentous injury and carpal instability diagnosed by MRI were not evident on scintigraphy. Using fast scanning protocols, the cost of MRI is comparable with that of BS. MRI should be considered as the appropriate second line investigation in these clinical circumstances.Can a day 4 bone scan accurately determine the presence or absence of scaphoid fracture?To evaluate the accuracy of day 4 bone scans in predicting the presence or absence of fracture in patients with "clinical scaphoid fracture."Prospective sensitivity study of ED patients with clinical scaphoid fractures. Each patient was immobilized in a thumb spica cast and had day 4 bone scans of both wrists and hands. Blinded day 4 bone scan results were ultimately compared with the diagnosis on day 14 when patients returned for repeat clinical examination and radiographs. In cases of equivocal radiographic or clinical examination results, a day 14 bone scan was performed.Two tertiary care teaching hospital emergency departments.All ED patients older than 16 years with the diagnosis of clinical scaphoid fracture were eligible.Ninety-nine patients were enrolled and successfully completed the study protocol from October 1990 through November 1992. One patient had bilateral injury, for a total of 100 completed studies. Day 4 bone scans were 100% sensitive and 92% specific, for a positive predictive value of 65%, a negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 93% (95% confidence interval, 88%, to 98%). Many other types of fractures were identified on the day 4 scans, including those of the triquetra, distal radius, capitate, hamate, trapezoid, trapezium, and metacarpals.Day 4 bone scans are an accurate means of ruling out scaphoid fracture. However, because of a significant number of false-positive scans at day 4, they do not reliably confirm the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture. The bone scans also permitted identification of several other wrist fractures that had not been radiographically apparent.A comparative analysis of the accuracy, diagnostic uncertainty and cost of imaging modalities in suspected scaphoid fractures.Clinical examination of suspected scaphoid fractures is sensitive, but not specific, and initial plain radiographs lack sensitivity. A variety of second-line imaging techniques have been proposed to improve immediate diagnosis and reduce overtreatment. Different sample populations and methods of reporting test performance have made side-by-side comparison difficult. The aim of this study is to describe the epidemiology of clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and determine the prevalence of true fracture. These data are used to compare second-line imaging techniques in our population.200 consecutive patients attending a trauma service with clinically suspected scaphoid fracture were followed through diagnosis to discharge.The prevalence of true fracture was 16% and was associated with male sex and injury playing sport. Magnetic resonance imaging has the best diagnostic performance, with the added benefit of soft tissue evaluation, but was the most expensive option. Ultrasound examination was least effective in detecting true fractures.Future studies should further evaluate the clinical and economic sequelae of overtreatment of suspected fractures. Clinicians should examine alternatives to "empirical" treatment without definite diagnosis based on their local facilities and patient demographics.[Occult fractures of the carpal navicular. Detection by quantitative radioscintigraphy. Social and medico-legal repercussions].Fractures of the scaphoid of the wrist are not easily diagnosed and when they are eventually recognized due to late complications, the prognosis is much poorer than it would have been at injury. Medical negligence and poorly-performed or interpreted x-rays are frequently cited as reasons for non-diagnosis. Often these fractures are trabecular, so-called occult, and they cannot be seen on a conventional exam, even if well-performed. Tomography and tomodensitometry have yielded poor results. Quantitative radioscintigraphy (QRS), the exam we are proposing, is a modification of scintigraphy, which is a very sensitive exam (100%) but has little specificity. The first step in QRS is to quantify the fixation of the tracer on the injured side and compare it to that of the uninjured side. If the injured side fixation is double that of the uninjured side, a fracture (often scaphoid) is present. MRI is our reference. In the second step in QRS, a computer-assisted fusion is made of the scintigraphic image and the x-ray (quantitative scintigraphy has the same diagnostic value as MRI). The center of the fracture is localized, thus yielding a specificity of nearly 100% for this exam. Out of a prospective series of 154 patients who had a conventional examination: 41% were diagnosed to have a scaphoid fracture using QSR, therefore a number higher than supposed. Rare carpal fractures were also detected. The cost of this exam is low. The exam climinates non-diagnosed fractures which can lead to non-union and arthrosis. Due to the frequency of carpal trauma, this exam should have a significant effect on the individual, on social security costs and litigations.Suspected scaphoid fractures in skeletally immature patients: application of MRI.The purpose of our study was to evaluate the MR findings in the wrists of pediatric patients who have sustained acute wrist injuries and to determine if this imaging method yields more information than combined serial radiographs and physical examinations.Eighteen skeletally immature patients (11 boys and 7 girls, age range 8-15 years) who had presented to the emergency room within 2 days following acute wrist trauma underwent serial clinical, radiographic, and MR examinations if there was a suspicion of a scaphoid fracture.Ten patients had a scaphoid abnormality on MR images. Six had fractures and four had regional bone marrow edema. Initially, all but two fractures were radiographically occult, although the other fractures eventually became evident on later studies. Those with marrow edema did not progress to fractures. Obliteration of the scaphoid fat stripe occurred in five patients with a scaphoid fracture and in six patients who did not have a fracture. Dorsal soft tissue swelling occurred in eight patients, five of whom had scaphoid fractures. Seven patients had evidence of extensor tenosynovitis on MRI.A normal initial MR image had a negative predictive value of 100%. Persistent snuffbox pain may represent injury to the scaphoid, extensor tendons, or dorsal soft tissues. An outcome study evaluating the benefits of early application of MR in the pediatric population is warranted.A prospective comparison for suspected scaphoid fractures: bone scintigraphy versus clinical outcome.Early diagnosis and treatment of scaphoid fractures limits the number of delayed and non-unions. Bone scintigraphy proved to be a sensitive diagnostic tool for the detection of occult scaphoid fractures. However, the results have to be interpreted with care.To prospectively correlate the results of bone scintigraphy with clinical outcome.In a prospective study, we analysed 50 consecutive patients with signs of a scaphoid fracture at physical examination but no evidence of a scaphoid fracture on scaphoid radiographs. All patients had a protocolised follow up at fixed intervals. The clinical outcome was defined according to a standardised algorithm.Bone scintigraphy revealed 32% (16/50) occult scaphoid fractures and 40% (20/50) occult other fractures. Clinical outcome proved that bone scintigraphy was false positive in five patients and in one case false negative for a scaphoid fracture.Bone scintigraphy in combination with protocolised physical examination is the gold standard for patients with signs of a scaphoid fracture that cannot be proven on scaphoid radiographs.Detection of occult wrist fractures by quantitative radioscintigraphy: a prospective study on selected patients.To determine the value of quantitative radioscintigraphy (QRS) in the diagnosis of wrist trauma occult fractures.Because of the risk of non-union, the diagnosis of wrist fractures, including scaphoid fractures, is essential but remains difficult despite many imaging modalities. The aim of the study was to assess the benefits of QRS in the diagnosis of occult post-trauma wrist fractures.This prospective study included all patients presenting at the orthopaedic department at Brest University Hospital for wrist pain after trauma with initial normal plain radiographs. Patients with normal radiographs but strongly suspected of fracture underwent QRS consisting of three-phase bone scintigraphy with quantitative analysis. When a fracture was suspected the radiograph and scintigraphy were fused to precisely locate the fracture if the index was higher than 2. If the index was lower than 1.9, fracture was excluded. Between these two indices, other investigations, such as magnetic resonance imaging, were performed. All patients were followed for at least 3 months and reviewed by the same surgeon. Patients underwent a physical examination and possibly other investigations.From April 2006 to July 2008, 87 patients were enrolled (34 women, 53 men; median age 29 years; range, 15-87 years). Among the 46 pathologic bone scintigrams, 55 occult fractures were highlighted. At follow-up, none presented non-union. One had an undetermined QRS. Among the 40 negative results for QRS at follow-up, only one had a non-union. Sensitivity and negative predictive value were 97 and 98%, respectively for carpal fractures.This study highlights the benefit of QRS, which allows the detection of most occult carpal fractures and reduces the risks of complications such as pseudoarthritis.Is there a place for radionuclide bone scintigraphy in the management of radiograph-negative scaphoid trauma?To evaluate the role of radionuclide bone scanning in patients with suspected scaphoid trauma, particularly in those with negative radiographs.Prospective. Radionuclide scans and carpal bone radiography were performed on all participants in the early post-injury period.Cape Town tertiary centre trauma unit.Fifty patients who presented with clinical features suggestive of scaphoid trauma.Definitive radiographic diagnosis of fracture or persistent clinical features of scaphoid trauma.All patients who had fractures demonstrated on standard radiography either at the initial visit (13 patients) or at 2 weeks (8 patients) had positive scintiscans (sensitivity 100%). Four of 6 patients who had a positive scan but negative first and second radiographs had persistent tenderness on clinical examination which required extended immobilisation in a plaster cast. The overall positive predictive value of scintigraphy was 93%. All patients with a negative scan were clinically and radiologically negative at 2 weeks (negative predictive value 100%). Evidence of multifocal injury was present in 12 scans, but only 1 radiograph. Thirty-one patients (62%) were scanned within 48 hours of injury.Bone scintigraphy can be used in radiograph-negative scaphoid area injury to exclude the need for further follow-up reliably, but those with positive scans still require clinical examination and radiography at 2 weeks.Value of MR imaging in the detection of occult scaphoid fractures.Can follow-up radiography for acute scaphoid fracture still be considered a valid investigation?To determine whether follow-up radiography is a valid diagnostic investigation in patients with suspected acute scaphoid fractures and normal initial radiographs.Fifty sets of radiographs (initial and follow-up) were independently assessed by four expert observers for the presence or absence of a scaphoid fracture. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), performed in all cases, was used as the gold standard to determine the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the observers' assessment of the follow-up radiograph. In addition, the reliability among observers of the follow-up radiograph was determined by reliability variance analysis.Of the 50 sets of radiographs, 35 patients had a scaphoid fracture and 15 were normal, as established from MRI report. For individual observer's assessment of the follow-up radiograph, sensitivities of 11, 9, 43 and 49%; specificities of 93, 93, 87 and 80%; positive predictive values of 80, 75, 88 and 85%; and negative predictive values of 31, 30, 39 and 40%. A reliability coefficient of more than 60% is needed for a diagnostic test to be considered reliable. Overall, the inter-observer reliability coefficient was 33%, with pair-wise inter-observer coefficients ranging from 18-53%.With poor sensitivity, poor negative predictive value and poor reliability, follow-up radiography cannot be considered a valid diagnostic examination for the detection of scaphoid fracture in patients with normal initial radiographs.[Clinical impact of MRI in acute wrist injuries. Indication and therapeutic consequences].This prospective study was aimed at evaluating the clinical impact of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) vs conventional radiographs in the early diagnosis of acute wrist fractures. The influence of MRI on the period of being unable to work was demonstrated.MRI was performed within a mean of 6.6 days after initial radiographs in 54 patients (56 wrists) with clinical suspicion of wrist fractures and normal plain or indistinct radiographs. MRI findings were read without knowledge of the initial radiographs.In 31 of 56 wrists MRI findings resulted in a change of diagnosis. There was a false positive diagnosis on plain radiographs in nearly one-half ( n=25) of the cases,whereas only six cases had false negative results. In 28 cases MRI allowed the detection of additional injuries of soft tissues. In 35 of 56 cases radiological follow-up was no longer necessary. In 22 of 54 patients the period of immobilization could be shortened or treatment discontinued ( n=18). The period of being unable to work was shortened in 16 of 54 patients, while in 7 of 54 patients this time span had to be prolonged for therapeutic reasons. In 31 of 54 patients MRI-based therapeutic consequences had no influence on the period of being unable to work.Our results show a high clinical impact of MRI in the detection of acute wrist fractures. Early MRI is able to reduce economic costs due to efficient therapeutic treatment and shortened periods of being unable to work. We recommend MRI immediately on the day of trauma in the presence of clinical suspicion and equivocal plain radiographsDiagnosis of occult scaphoid fractures and other wrist injuries. Are repeated clinical examinations and plain radiographs still state of the art?To examine the efficacy of repeated clinical examinations and follow-up radiographs, 121 patients were prospectively and consecutively randomised and clinically followed until a final diagnosis was achieved. All of these patients additionally underwent magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans within an average of 3 days after trauma to control the results of this study. MRI detected 112 injuries in 82 patients (67%). Twenty-eight (25%) of these injuries were scaphoid fractures. There were 15 fractures of other carpal bones, 14 avulsion fractures of extrinsic ligaments (AFL), 26 other bone injuries (fractures of distal radius, fractures of radial styloid, ulnar head fracture metacarpal fracture, bone bruises), and 29 soft tissue injuries (triangular fibro-cartilaginous complex injuries, complete or partial ruptures of the scapholunate ligament, ruptures of the radial collateral ligament, hemarthrosis). By means of repeated clinical examinations and plain scaphoid views, experienced observers were able to detect all the occult scaphoid fractures within 38 days, as well as most of the other fractures about the wrist except one fracture of the triquetrum. Soft tissue injuries, however, were diagnosed only in two cases of complete scapholunate ligament tears. It was further obvious that 70% of all scaphoid fractures and 60% of the AFLs were detected in a review of the initial X-rays by experienced surgeons. Only 30% of all scaphoid fractures detected were really occult and all of these were diagnosed correctly. This prospective study demonstrates that clinical and radiological standard procedures are reliable in the diagnosis of occult fractures of the carpus and wrist when performed by experienced observers. MRI scans are indicated for early diagnosis of occult fractures and soft tissue injuries about the wrist.The usefulness of CT for patients with carpal bone fractures in the emergency department.The wrist is the most commonly injured joint in the body. However, wrist injuries are often missed in the emergency department (ED). If the fracture is not diagnosed and remains untreated, the patient runs a considerable risk of chronic disability. The utility of CT as an aid in the diagnosis of carpal bone fracture was investigated.A retrospective analysis was performed of patients who underwent CT and plain radiography for wrist injury in the ED between March 2003 and February 2006. Plain radiograph interpretations were classified into three groups: (1) the definite fracture group, (2) the no fracture group, and (3) the ambiguous fracture group. The CT results were analysed in relation to the classification of the plain radiograph interpretation. The final diagnoses reviewed from the medical records were used as the reference standard.36 carpal fractures in 33 patients were identified from 45 patients who underwent plain radiography and CT. The interpretations of plain radiographs were classified into definite fractures (n = 10), ambiguous fractures (n = 15) and no fractures (n = 20). When both the definite fracture and ambiguous fracture groups were considered positive, the sensitivity and specificity were 69.7% and 83.3%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of CT scans were both 100%.Emergency physicians should consider CT of the wrist after plain radiography when patients with suspected carpal fracture show normal radiographic findings.[Bone scintigraphy in the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture].Value of bone scintigraphy in patients with carpal trauma.We planned this study to evaluate the role of bone scintigraphy in patients with suspected carpal fracture and normal or suspicious radiographs following carpal injury.Three-phase bone scintigraphy using Tc-99m-MDP was performed on 32 patients with negative radiographs but clinically suspected fracture at two weeks after the trauma. Focally increased radiopharmaceutical uptake was interpreted as a fracture. The final diagnosis was established with clinical follow-up.Twelve (38%) patients had a normal scan excluding fracture. Twelve patients had a single fracture. Multifocal fracture was present in 8 (25%) patients. Eight patients showed scaphoid fractures; of these three showed single scaphoid fracture, and the other five patients revealed accompanying fractures. Distal radius fractures and carpal bone fractures other than scaphoid were both observed in 12 patients. These were eleven fractures of distal radius; three fractures of pisiform; two fractures of hamate; and single fractures of lunate, trapezium and triquetrum. In one patient there was fracture of a first metacarpal bone.In patients with suspected carpal bone fracture and normal or suspicious radiographs, bone scintigraphy can be used as a reliable method to confirm or exclude the presence of a scaphoid fracture and to detect clinically unsuspected fractures of distal radius and other carpal bones.[Occult fractures of the wrist joint: high resolution image magnification roentgen versus MRI].To compare the diagnostic value of high definition macroradiography and MRI in patients with the suspicion of occult wrist fractures.In a prospective study, 23 patients with clinically suspected wrist fractures and normal initial plain radiographs underwent high resolution macroradiography and MR imaging shortly after trauma. Macroradiographs were taken with a microfocus tube using an anode of 0.03-0.3 mm providing a 4x magnification of the wrist, which was obtained in 4 projections. MR images were performed on a 1.0 T MR unit in coronal planes using T1 weighted SE, T2.-weighted 3D GE, and Turbo-STIR sequences. Follow-up radiographs after 6 weeks were used to confirm the diagnosis of a primary occult wrist fracture.Macroradiography depicted 5 wrist fractures: 4 fractures of the scaphoid bone and 1 fracture of the capitate bone. MRI demonstrated 11 fractures (one of them false-positive): 9 fractures of the scaphoid bone and two fractures of the capitate bone. Using macroradiography, the sensitivity for the detection of occult fractures of the wrist was 50% with a specificity of 100%, using MRI the sensitivity was 100% with a specificity of 92%.MRI seems to be superior to high resolution macroradiography in the detection of occult scaphoid fractures and thus is recommended in the management of patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fractures not evident on initial plain films.[Bone scintigraphy in suspected fracture of the scaphoid bone].Skeletal scintigraphy of the wrist in suggested scaphoid fracture.Skeletal scintigraphy was performed in 187 patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture but with normal radiographic findings. In 85 patients focally moderately (12 patients) or markedly to intensely (73 patients) increased radionuclide uptake was seen, over either the distal radius or carpal bones. A fracture corresponding to markedly increased uptake was eventually verified in 15 out of 26 patients in the distal radius, in 21 out of 28 in the scaphoid but in only 6 out of 18 in other carpal bones. One fracture of the body and one of the hook of the hamate were found, one fracture of the capitate and three of the triquetrum. Not a single fracture was verified in 10 patients with markedly, often intensely, increased activity over the trapezium/trapezoid. It is concluded that scintigraphy is of value in carpal trauma not only to exclude scaphoid fracture but also to direct the attention to the possibility of other carpal fractures, otherwise usually missed.Diagnostic accuracy of multidetector computed tomography for patients with suspected scaphoid fractures and negative radiographic examinations.The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) in detecting occult scaphoid fractures.A total of 54 patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and negative initial conventional radiographs were evaluated with 64-row MDCT wrist examinations within 1 week of the trauma. The gold standard used was the diagnosis on MRI done within 1 week after MDCT. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) of MDCT were calculated.MRI showed a total of 22 fractures in 20 of 55 (36%) wrists. Fractures included 14 scaphoid and 8 other carpal bones. MDCT showed a total of 19 fractures in 17 of 55 (30%) wrists. Two isolated scaphoid fractures and one trapezium fracture were missed on MDCT. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of MDCT were 86%, 100%, 100%, and 91%, respectively.MDCT offers highly accurate results, especially concerning cortical involvement, and is a useful alternative in facilities lacking MRI.Clinical utility of tomosynthesis in suspected scaphoid fracture. A pilot study.Radiography alone will not detect all scaphoid fractures. There is a reported prevalence between 9 and 33% of occult scaphoid fractures. The evidence-based literature suggests that magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the most suitable secondary imaging modality due to the ability to evaluate the bone marrow directly and to also identify other injuries. However, there is no consensus on the choice of follow-up imaging strategy-computed tomography, MRI, or bone scan-across different institutions. Tomosynthesis is a new digital tomographic method creating multiple thin tomographic sections. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the clinical utility of tomosynthesis in suspected occult fracture.Thirty-five patients with a clinically suspected occult scaphoid fracture after initial normal radiography were imaged with repeat radiography and tomosynthesis scan 2 weeks after trauma.Repeat radiography revealed one previously undetected scaphoid tubercle avulsion and one scaphoid waist fracture, confirmed by tomosynthesis. Tomosynthesis revealed two additional scaphoid waist fractures. In total, three initially occult scaphoid waist fractures were detected (9%). No additional fractures were detected in the remaining 32 patients during a 1-year follow-up.Tomosynthesis can demonstrate occult scaphoid fractures not visible at radiography.Investigation of computed tomographic scan concurrent criterion validity in doubtful scaphoid fracture of the wrist.Rapid diagnosis of scaphoid bone fracture in the wrist is important so that appropriate treatment can be started. If a fracture is clinically suspected without being visible on radiography, further investigation has to be conducted to reveal a fracture or to rule it out. The objective of this study was to investigate the validity of computed tomographic (CT) scanning and bone scintigraphy compared with the clinical fracture rate during follow-up of 1 year for examining patients with a suspected scaphoid fracture.Bone scintigraphy and CT scanning were performed in 29 patients with persistent clinical suspicion of a scaphoid bone fracture 5 to 10 days after trauma.The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the CT scan were 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of bone scintigraphy were 78%, 90%, 78%, and 90%, respectively. Seven patients showed a fracture on both CT scanning and bone scintigraphy. Eighteen patients showed no fracture on both CT scanning and bone scintigraphy. A false-positive bone scintigram showed up in two patients and a false-negative bone scintigram in another two patients.CT scanning is a rapid, simple, valid method for demonstrating or ruling out a scaphoid fracture and is superior to bone scintigraphy.Radiographically occult scaphoid fractures: value of MR imaging in detection.To evaluate the diagnostic value of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fractures and normal initial plain radiographs.MR imaging was performed within 7 days after trauma in 42 patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fractures and normal plain radiographs. T1-weighted spin-echo, T2*-weighted gradient-echo, and short inversion time inversion-recovery (STIR) sequences were performed. MR images were evaluated independently by two radiologists. Six-week follow-up radiographs were used as a standard to diagnose fractures.MR imaging depicted occult fractures of the scaphoid bone in 14 patients (33%), the capitate bone in four (10%), the trapezium in one (2%), and the distal radius in two (5%). All wrist fractures were detected with a combination of STIR and T1-weighted spin-echo sequences. The sensitivity and specificity for detection of radiographically occult fractures of the wrist were 100% each for the first and 95% and 100%, respectively, for the second radiologist with an almost perfect interobserver agreement (K = 0.953).MR imaging has a high sensitivity for detection of fractures of the scaphoid bone and wrist not evident on plain radiographs and may enable early diagnosis and treatment.[MRI in radiologically occult scaphoid fractures. Initial experiences with 1.0 Tesla (whole body-middle field equipment) versus 0.2 Tesla (dedicated low-field equipment)].The study was performed to determine the diagnostic value of different MR systems and field strengths in patients with occult scaphoid and wrist fractures. Twelve patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture but normal plain radiographs were examined by MRI. A dedicated 0.2-T unit (Esaote) and a 1.0-T unit (NT10, Philips) were used. Coronal T1W-SE, STIR, and T2*W-GE sequences were obtained with both systems. Images were evaluated for a bone marrow abnormality, a trabecular or cortical fracture line, and were compared to the 6-week follow-up radiographs. Seven wrist fractures were found at 0.2 T and 1.0 T, proven in the follow-up radiographs. A bone marrow abnormality was present in all seven fractures on both systems. Trabecular and cortical fracture lines were visualized at 0.2 T in four cases and at 1.0 T in seven cases. Low-field MR imaging at 0.2 T and mid-field MR imaging at 1.0 T seem to be equivalent in the diagnosis of a fracture in radiographically occult scaphoid and wrist fractures. In the visualization of fracture details, important for therapeutic and prognostic considerations, 1.0 T seems to be superior.Use of early magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of occult scaphoid fractures: the CAST Study (Canberra Area Scaphoid Trial).To establish the effectiveness of early magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture in patients with suggestive clinical findings (but a normal initial X-ray) in an Australian major-referral emergency departmentA prospective study of patients who presented within 24 hours after trauma with clinical findings suggestive of a scaphoid fracture but no evidence of fracture on the initial X-ray. MRI was performed within 24 hours of presentation. Clinical review in patients with normal initial MRI was carried out in 10 days and repeat MRI was carried out when clinically indicated.A total of 22 patients were enrolled. Early MRI within 24 hours revealed 6 scaphoid fractures, 2 distal radial fractures and a hamate fracture. Thirteen patients had no fracture on the initial MRI. Upon clinical review in 10 days, 5 of these patients were clinically cleared and discharged. Eight of these patients underwent repeat MRI none of which revealed a fracture.In an Australian tertiary hospital with MRI facility, the early use of MRI is a sensitive and practical way to diagnose occult scaphoid fractures and saves unnecessary immobilisation.Outcome of routine bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.Undisplaced scaphoid fractures are easily missed on conventional scaphoid radiographs, but these occult fractures may seriously impair hand function. Routine bone scintigraphy (BS) is often advocated if there are clinical signs of a scaphoid fracture without radiological evidence. However, the results require careful therapeutic management.To determine the diagnostic value of BS in daily practice for clinically suspected scaphoid fractures.We evaluated our protocol of routine BS in suspected scaphoid fractures.In a retrospective study, we analysed 111 consecutive cases with signs of a scaphoid fracture on physical examination. Radiographs revealed 55 fractures, the remaining 56 patients all underwent BS.On average, the BS was performed after 4 days. It showed a fracture in 38/56 of the patients. The distribution of fractures was: scaphoid bone 15, distal radius 11, other carpal bones 9 and metacarpal bones 3.If there is a strong clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture, which cannot be confirmed by conventional radiology, BS is a valuable diagnostic tool.Bone scintigraphy in the management of X-ray-negative potential scaphoid fractures.One hundred and eleven patients with signs and symptoms of carpal scaphoid injury, but with no fracture visible on X-ray, underwent bone scintigraphy of the wrists. The first 42 patients were re-X-rayed 10 days after injury: bone scanning had identified all fractures confirmed on this X-ray; there were no false negative bone scans. Sixty-seven patients (60%) did not have increased focal uptake over the scaphoid or distal radius, and were mobilised immediately. None of these had a fracture at follow up. Twenty-nine patients with increased uptake over the scaphoid area (26%) remained in plaster of Paris for 6 weeks. All of these had clinical signs of a scaphoid injury. Bone scanning is a practical investigation for all X-ray-negative potential scaphoid injuries, and is acceptable to patient and clinician. In the presence of a normal scan, the practice of re-X-raying patients 10 days after injury may be abandoned.MR imaging of clinically suspected scaphoid fractures.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in revealing occult fractures in patients with clinically suspected acute scaphoid fractures who have normal or equivocal findings on radiographs.Thirty-six patients underwent MR imaging within 7 days of wrist injury. All had physical findings suggestive of scaphoid fracture. Coronal T1-weighted, short inversion time inversion recovery, and either T2-weighted or proton density-weighted fast spin-echo sequences with fat suppression were used. Follow-up radiographs were obtained at least 2 weeks after MR imaging whenever possible. All imaging studies were reviewed by two musculoskeletal radiologists.MR imaging revealed 22 occult fractures in 20 patients. Thirteen of these 22 fractures were in the scaphoid bone, and nine were in the distal radius. On MR images, 16 patients had no evidence of fracture. Follow-up radiographs were available in 14 of the 20 patients who had occult fracture revealed by MR imaging. Eleven of the 13 occult fractures of the scaphoid bone were followed up (two were lost to follow-up), and 10 of the 11 showed signs of healing. Five of the nine lesions of the distal radius were followed up, and three of these showed evidence of healing fracture. Three patients without MR evidence of a fracture had follow-up radiographs that showed no fracture. Three patients had findings consistent with bone contusion on MR images; in two patients, the contusion was associated with other fractures, and in one patient, the contusion was isolated.MR imaging can reveal occult wrist fractures when findings on radiographs are normal or equivocal.Bone scanning of fractures of the scaphoid.The value of isotope scanning in patients with clinical signs of fracture of the carpal scaphoid bone and negative or non-diagnostic initial radiographs was examined. 30 patients were examined using both radiography and isotope scanning. A normal scan excludes a fracture. Increased activity localized to the scaphoid bone indicates a fracture. 9 patients had fracture of the scaphoid evident on bone scans within 2 weeks of the injury. It took 2-6 weeks before these fractures showed up on radiographs.[Imaging diagnostics of the wrist: MRI and Arthrography/Arthro-CT].To evaluate the use of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) compared with arthrography and arthro-CT (AG/ACT) in patients with wrist pain.MRI and arthrography/arthro-CT (AG/ACT) of the wrist joint were retrospectively evaluated in 346 patients over a three-year period. Imaging findings were correlated to surgical results (n = 78) or clinical course in an at least 6-month follow-up.For tears of the triangular fibrocartilage, arthrography, arthro-CT, and MRI demonstrated a sensitivity and specificity of more than 0.96. Only the positive predictive value was superior for arthrography/arthro-CT (0.99 and 0.98, respectively) compared with MRI (0.94). Arthrography was superior for functional diagnosis of scapho-lunate ligament tears (n = 25). Ulno-lunate and ulno-triquetral ligament defects were demonstrated more exactly by arthrography. Traumatic osseous defects, particularly scaphoid fractures (n = 33) and avascular necrosis (n = 17), were better diagnosed using MRI.For suspected lesions of the triangular fibrocartilage complex, AG/ACT is slightly more reliable than MRI. However, MRI was found to be highly accurate in diagnosing TFC tears, and is superior to AG/ACT in detecting traumatic and vascular lesions of the wrist.Significance of a hot spot on the bone scan after carpal injury--evaluation by computed tomography.The use of bone scintigraphy in patients with negative radiographs after carpal injury is widely advocated. However, focally increased activity on the bone scan in the scaphoid or other carpal bones cannot always be radiologically confirmed as a fracture. To confirm scintigraphically suspected carpal fractures, computed tomography (CT) of the wrist was performed in patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and initially negative radiographs. All patients underwent plain radiography, bone scintigraphy and CT. The combination of plain radiographs and CT, as judged by a panel of experienced observers, was used as the reference standard. In 18 patients, 21 out of 22 carpal hot spots on bone scintigraphy could be radiologically confirmed as a fracture. The diagnosis was missed by CT scan in three patients with proven fractures on plain radiographs. We conclude that, in patients with negative initial radiographs following carpal injury, a positive bone scan must be interpreted as a fracture.A comparison of bone scintigraphy and MRI in the early diagnosis of the occult scaphoid waist fracture.To determine the accuracy of MRI in the assessment of the radiographically occult scaphoid fracture.This prospective study compared the sensitivity and specificity of MRI for detection of radiographically occult scaphoid fractures with bone scintigraphy (BS), the currently accepted imaging modality of choice. Consecutive patients with clinical signs of a scaphoid injury but no evidence of fracture on plain radiographs at presentation and after 7-10 days were evaluated by MRI and BS. All images were reported in masked fashion and the sensitivities and specificities of the imaging modalities determined. All patients with a scaphoid fracture demonstrated by MRI or BS were followed for at least a year after injury.Forty-three subjects (aged 12-74 years) had both MRI and BS carried out on average 19 days from the injury date.Six patients (14%) had scaphoid waist fractures. There were other bony injuries in a further six. In 40 patients there was agreement between the BS and MRI findings. In three cases there was discrepancy between the imaging modalities; in all three MRI was found to be the more sensitive and specific. MRI could become the investigation of choice for this injury.Computed tomography of suspected scaphoid fractures.Computed tomography (CT) can be used to triage suspected scaphoid fractures. This study assessed intraobserver and interobserver reliability and positive and negative predictive values of CT for the diagnosis of a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture.Eight observers evaluated CT scans from 30 patients (13 with nondisplaced scaphoid fractures, 17 with no scaphoid fractures) for the presence or absence of a fracture. Five observers evaluated the scans a second time. Statistical analyses included intraobserver and interobserver reliability and diagnostic characteristics.Computed tomography had substantial intraobserver and interobserver reliability for the diagnosis of a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture. The average sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT for a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture were 89%, 91%, and 90% for the first round and 97%, 85%, and 88% for the second round of observations, respectively. Based on an estimated prevalence of 5% true fractures among patients with suspected scaphoid fractures, the average positive predictive value for the detection of radiographically occult scaphoid fractures with tomography of the wrist was 0.28. The average negative predictive value was 0.99.Computed tomography should be used with caution for triage of nondisplaced scaphoid fractures because false-positive results occur, perhaps from misinterpretation of vascular foraminae or other normal lines in the scaphoid. Given the relative infrequency of true fractures among patients with suspected scaphoid fractures, CT is better for ruling out a fracture than for ruling one in.Bone scintigraphy in patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture.CT of the wrist in suspected scaphoid fracture.Bone scan and sagittal projection CT of the scaphoid was performed in 10 patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fractures. The primary and follow-up plain radiographs were negative or equivocal for fracture. CT examination demonstrated scaphoid fracture in 7 patients and normal findings in 3. It is concluded that CT of the scaphoid can replace bone scan to diagnose or rule out fracture in institutions where nuclear medicine facilities are not available.Magnetic resonance imaging of occult scaphoid fractures.Occult fractures of the scaphoid bone occur frequently and may lead to nonunions. In a prospective blind study, we performed magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) examinations on 32 patients who had sustained a wrist injury and in whom a scaphoid fracture was clinically suspected, but could not be confirmed on the original set of two routine and four scaphoid view radiographs. The MRI examinations were performed an average time of 2.8 days after the trauma. This prospective study proved that MRI is able to diagnose occult scaphoid fractures without delay and without the use of radioactive diagnostic means. Sensitivity and specificity of MRI were 100%. This conventional method could save $7,200 (US) per 100,000 inhabitants in providing an immediate and correct diagnosis and avoiding unnecessary cast immobilization. Additional injuries that may be misdiagnosed by conventional radiographs are also detected with a specificity and sensitivity of 100%.A prospective comparison for suspected scaphoid fractures: bone scintigraphy versus clinical outcome.Early diagnosis and treatment of scaphoid fractures limits the number of delayed and non-unions. Bone scintigraphy proved to be a sensitive diagnostic tool for the detection of occult scaphoid fractures. However, the results have to be interpreted with care.To prospectively correlate the results of bone scintigraphy with clinical outcome.In a prospective study, we analysed 50 consecutive patients with signs of a scaphoid fracture at physical examination but no evidence of a scaphoid fracture on scaphoid radiographs. All patients had a protocolised follow up at fixed intervals. The clinical outcome was defined according to a standardised algorithm.Bone scintigraphy revealed 32% (16/50) occult scaphoid fractures and 40% (20/50) occult other fractures. Clinical outcome proved that bone scintigraphy was false positive in five patients and in one case false negative for a scaphoid fracture.Bone scintigraphy in combination with protocolised physical examination is the gold standard for patients with signs of a scaphoid fracture that cannot be proven on scaphoid radiographs.[Possibilities of scintigraphy in the early diagnosis of fracture of the scaphoid bone in the hand].Early computerized tomography accurately determines the presence or absence of scaphoid and other fractures.To validate the use of early CT in predicting scaphoid fracture and other fractures in patients with suspected scaphoid fracture.A prospective observational study of adult patients with a diagnosis of clinical scaphoid fracture presenting to a regional ED. Patients were immobilized in a scaphoid plaster and had a CT (wrist and carpals) same or next day. The gold standard used was the diagnosis on Day 10 with clinical examination and X-rays, with MRI performed in patients with persistent tenderness but normal X-rays.Forty-seven patients completed the study protocol from September 2004 until February 2006. For all fractures, early CT had a 96.8% negative predictive value and 100% positive predictive value (94.4% sensitive, 100% specific). No scaphoid fracture was missed by early CT. One patient had a trapezium fracture on CT, with a coexistent subtle capitate fracture only detected on MRI.Early CT scans show promise in the diagnosis of scaphoid and other fractures of the wrist and carpals. Further study is warranted to validate early CT in clinical scaphoid fracture as an alternative to other early advanced imaging, or plaster immobilization and 2 week review.[Value of bone scintigraphy in the recognition of scaphoid bone fracture difficult to detect roentgenologically].Fractures result in increased metabolism of the bone and increased uptake of certain radioisotopes as demonstrated by bone scanning. By comparison, X-rays reveal a fracture only by a disturbance in skeletal structure. In this study, scaphoid fractures which were difficult to detect initially on X-rays were demonstrated by bone scan eight days later. The value of this diagnostic technique was demonstrated in several cases.[MRI scanning in suspected fractures of the scaphoid bone].MR examination was performed in 20 patients clinically suspected of having a fracture of the scaphoid bone. The patients also followed the normal routine with conventional radiographs in the acute fase and after 10-12 days. The MR was in most cases performed within a day after the trauma. All fractures seen on conventional radiographs were depicted on MR. MR further showed four fractures, five bone contusions (bone bruise) and lesions of the soft tissues in 75% of the patients. In patients with suspected fracture of the scaphoid, MR seems to be the best primary imaging method and displays a wide range of lesions.Early magnetic resonance imaging compared with bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.We evaluated 100 consecutive patients with a suspected scaphoid fracture but without evidence of a fracture on plain radiographs using MRI within 24 hours of injury, and bone scintigraphy three to five days after injury. The reference standard for a true radiologically-occult scaphoid fracture was either a diagnosis of fracture on both MRI and bone scintigraphy, or, in the case of discrepancy, clinical and/or radiological evidence of a fracture. MRI revealed 16 scaphoid and 24 other fractures. Bone scintigraphy showed 28 scaphoid and 40 other fractures. According to the reference standard there were 20 scaphoid fractures. MRI was falsely negative for scaphoid fracture in four patients and bone scintigraphy falsely positive in eight. MRI had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 100%. Bone scintigraphy had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 90%. This study did not confirm that early, short-sequence MRI was superior to bone scintigraphy for the diagnosis of a suspected scaphoid fracture. Bone scintigraphy remains a highly sensitive and reasonably specific investigation for the diagnosis of an occult scaphoid fracture.[Contribution of quantitative radio-scintigraphy to diagnosis of wrist injuries undetected on plain films: a prospective study of 154 cases].Fractures of the scaphoid must be diagnosed quickly to avoid persistent nonunion and the risk of osteoarthritis. Despite meticulous physical examination and adequate x-ray detection, numerous occult fractures still go unrecognized. The aim of this prospective study was to analyze the pertinence of quantitative radio-scintigraphy (QRS) presently used for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures.Quantitative radio-scintigraphy (QRS) is a new imaging technique associating quantitative bone scan and numerical fusion between bone scan images and x-ray images. We conducted a prospective study between November 1994 and March 1999 to evaluate the pertinence of this examination technique for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures in patients presenting clinical symptoms suggestive of wrist fracture but whose plain x-rays were initially considered normal. Further some patients had several series of plain x-rays performed at several week intervals in order to search for fractures becoming progressively visible on plain x-rays. After the QRS data was acquired, these patients' x-rays were reviewed again. We also compared the cost of QRS, repeated x-rays, bone scan and MRI at the Besançon University Hospital.QRS was performed in all 154 patients and revealed 61 fractures (56 single-line and 5 multiple-line fractures). Thus 43.5% of these patients had occult wrist fractures (41% of which involved the carpal scaphoid).Occult fracture of the wrist, particularly the carpal scaphoid, is frequent. Repeated x-ray examination does not increase the rate of detection of these fractures. Bone scans may also fail to reveal occult fractures. MRI is a key examination in the assessment of wrist fracture symptoms, but is presently not available in all institutions. Bone scan is classically insufficiently precise. QRS is a rapidly available low-cost examination which we have found to be indispensable for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures. With early QRS diagnosis, the risk of neglected carpal scaphoid fracture and subsequent nonunion and osteoarthritis together with the personal, social, and medicolegal consequences can be avoided.Determining the presence of scaphoid fracture with a day 4 bone scan.MRI diagnosis of fracture of the scaphoid bone: impact of a new practice where the images are read by radiographers.To investigate whether magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) radiographers are able to evaluate MRI examinations with regard to scaphoid fractures to save patients unnecessary immobilization and clinical and radiographic examinations, and to reduce the costs for the hospital as well as society in general.Over a 1-year period 224 consecutive patients with a suspected clinical scaphoid fracture but negative radiography were referred for MRI and examined within 11 hours. The MR images were primarily evaluated by the MRI radiographer on duty. Other fractures and bone edema were not reported because these were not part of the work-up protocol agreed upon by the radiology and the orthopedic departments. The following weekday a final report was provided by a radiologist. For the economical analysis the official price-list for Danish hospital service was used.The MRI radiographers reported 43 scaphoid fractures, whereas the radiologist ultimately diagnosed only 36 scaphoid fractures (16.1% of patients) (sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 96.3%). Six of the seven false-positive fractures occurred in patients with edema of the scaphoid. The seventh false-positive was a fracture of the capitate. The hospital saved at least 20,000 and the social care system 70.000.It is possible to provide an acute MRI service to patients with clinically suspected fracture of the scaphoid and a normal plain radiograph. The MR images can be primarily read by sufficiently trained MR radiographers. This new work-up protocol reduces the cost for society.[Prospective comparison of MRI vs. direct magnification radiography in occult fractures of the scaphoid bone].The diagnosis of occult fractures of the scaphoid bone is even more challenging than that of conventional fractures of the scaphoid. This study aimed to compare prospectively the gold standard method (plain radiographs in four projections, after about 14 days) and the primary findings with direct magnification radiography (DIMA) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Primary MRI showed much higher diagnostic power than plain radiography at 10-14 days in occult scaphoid fractures and in detection of associated carpal injuries. This may lead to a decreasing time of disease. DIMA was inferior in detecting occult fractures of the scaphoid.Diagnosis of scaphoid fracture and dedicated extremity MRI.We evaluated the value of dedicated extremity magnetic resonance imaging (E-MRI) in patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture and normal initial radiographs. 52 patients underwent E-MRI within a mean of 4 (2-10) days after trauma. Follow-up radiographs were performed at average 11 (8-14) weeks after trauma, and these images were used as the "gold standard". A T1-weighted turbo gradient echo 3D and a tau short inversion recovery STIR were performed, both in coronal planes. The imaging time was less than 10 min. The images were evaluated independently by two radiologists. E-MRI detected occult fractures of the scaphoid in 9 patients, and of the distal radius in a further 6 patients. All these fractures were confirmed at follow-up radiographs. Furthermore, E-MRI revealed a fracture of the capitate bone in 1 patient, and of the triquetrum in 2 patients, and in 8 patients, bone bruise in 1 or more of the carpal bones. However, these fractures and bone lesions could not be confirmed by the follow-up radiographs. The agreement between the two examiners was high (kappa = 0.8) for E-MRI detection of fractures. E-MRI seems to be better than radiographs in the early diagnosis of occult fractures of the scaphoid bone and the wrist.Clinically suspected scaphoid fracture: a comparison of magnetic resonance imaging and bone scintigraphy.59 patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fracture, but negative radiographs at presentation and review, were examined by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and bone scintigraphy (BS). The diagnoses were compared with subsequent follow-up. There were four scaphoid fractures, 10 other fractures and three significant ligamentous injuries. All scaphoid fractures were identified by MRI and BS. MRI showed better interobserver agreement for scaphoid injury than BS and fewer false positive reports. Significant ligamentous injury and carpal instability diagnosed by MRI were not evident on scintigraphy. Using fast scanning protocols, the cost of MRI is comparable with that of BS. MRI should be considered as the appropriate second line investigation in these clinical circumstances.Magnetic resonance imaging of suspected scaphoid fractures using a low field dedicated extremity MR system.To determine whether magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) using a dedicated extremity system could be utilized for the routine assessment of patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture, and to determine the most cost-effective timing of MRI for these patients.MRI of the wrist using a 0.2T extremity MR system was performed in two groups of patients. Fifty-six patients were examined within 4 days of injury and 53 with persistent symptoms at 10 days to 6 weeks following injury. A scaphoid series of radiographs was negative in both groups.The early MR group had seven scaphoid, six radial and four other fractures. Management was altered in 89%. The late MR group had 14 scaphoid, nine radial and three other fractures. Management was altered in 69%. A cost model showed that overall costs are less with early rather than late scanning.MRI of the wrist when scaphoid fracture is suspected can be undertaken in all patients with negative radiographs and could be performed in most departments with an MRI machine. There are significant patient benefits and overall costs would change little from conventional practice.Can a day 4 bone scan accurately determine the presence or absence of scaphoid fracture?To evaluate the accuracy of day 4 bone scans in predicting the presence or absence of fracture in patients with "clinical scaphoid fracture."Prospective sensitivity study of ED patients with clinical scaphoid fractures. Each patient was immobilized in a thumb spica cast and had day 4 bone scans of both wrists and hands. Blinded day 4 bone scan results were ultimately compared with the diagnosis on day 14 when patients returned for repeat clinical examination and radiographs. In cases of equivocal radiographic or clinical examination results, a day 14 bone scan was performed.Two tertiary care teaching hospital emergency departments.All ED patients older than 16 years with the diagnosis of clinical scaphoid fracture were eligible.Ninety-nine patients were enrolled and successfully completed the study protocol from October 1990 through November 1992. One patient had bilateral injury, for a total of 100 completed studies. Day 4 bone scans were 100% sensitive and 92% specific, for a positive predictive value of 65%, a negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 93% (95% confidence interval, 88%, to 98%). Many other types of fractures were identified on the day 4 scans, including those of the triquetra, distal radius, capitate, hamate, trapezoid, trapezium, and metacarpals.Day 4 bone scans are an accurate means of ruling out scaphoid fracture. However, because of a significant number of false-positive scans at day 4, they do not reliably confirm the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture. The bone scans also permitted identification of several other wrist fractures that had not been radiographically apparent.A comparative analysis of the accuracy, diagnostic uncertainty and cost of imaging modalities in suspected scaphoid fractures.Clinical examination of suspected scaphoid fractures is sensitive, but not specific, and initial plain radiographs lack sensitivity. A variety of second-line imaging techniques have been proposed to improve immediate diagnosis and reduce overtreatment. Different sample populations and methods of reporting test performance have made side-by-side comparison difficult. The aim of this study is to describe the epidemiology of clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and determine the prevalence of true fracture. These data are used to compare second-line imaging techniques in our population.200 consecutive patients attending a trauma service with clinically suspected scaphoid fracture were followed through diagnosis to discharge.The prevalence of true fracture was 16% and was associated with male sex and injury playing sport. Magnetic resonance imaging has the best diagnostic performance, with the added benefit of soft tissue evaluation, but was the most expensive option. Ultrasound examination was least effective in detecting true fractures.Future studies should further evaluate the clinical and economic sequelae of overtreatment of suspected fractures. Clinicians should examine alternatives to "empirical" treatment without definite diagnosis based on their local facilities and patient demographics.[Occult fractures of the carpal navicular. Detection by quantitative radioscintigraphy. Social and medico-legal repercussions].Fractures of the scaphoid of the wrist are not easily diagnosed and when they are eventually recognized due to late complications, the prognosis is much poorer than it would have been at injury. Medical negligence and poorly-performed or interpreted x-rays are frequently cited as reasons for non-diagnosis. Often these fractures are trabecular, so-called occult, and they cannot be seen on a conventional exam, even if well-performed. Tomography and tomodensitometry have yielded poor results. Quantitative radioscintigraphy (QRS), the exam we are proposing, is a modification of scintigraphy, which is a very sensitive exam (100%) but has little specificity. The first step in QRS is to quantify the fixation of the tracer on the injured side and compare it to that of the uninjured side. If the injured side fixation is double that of the uninjured side, a fracture (often scaphoid) is present. MRI is our reference. In the second step in QRS, a computer-assisted fusion is made of the scintigraphic image and the x-ray (quantitative scintigraphy has the same diagnostic value as MRI). The center of the fracture is localized, thus yielding a specificity of nearly 100% for this exam. Out of a prospective series of 154 patients who had a conventional examination: 41% were diagnosed to have a scaphoid fracture using QSR, therefore a number higher than supposed. Rare carpal fractures were also detected. The cost of this exam is low. The exam climinates non-diagnosed fractures which can lead to non-union and arthrosis. Due to the frequency of carpal trauma, this exam should have a significant effect on the individual, on social security costs and litigations.Early computed tomography compared with bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.This study examined whether multidetector computed tomography (CT) is superior to bone scintigraphy for diagnosis of an occult scaphoid fracture.In a study period of 22 months, 100 consecutive patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and no fracture on scaphoid radiographs, were evaluated with CT within 24 hours after injury and bone scintigraphy between 3 and 5 days after injury. The reference standard for a true (radiographic occult) scaphoid fracture was either (1) diagnosis of fracture on both CT and bone scintigraphy or (2) in case of discrepancy, clinical and/or radiographic evidence of a fracture during follow-up.CT showed 10 scaphoid and 18 other fractures. Bone scintigraphy showed 21 scaphoid and 36 other fractures. According to the reference standard, there were 14 scaphoid fractures. CT had a sensitivity of 64%, specificity of 99%, accuracy of 94%, a positive predictive value of 90%, and a negative predictive value of 94%. Bone scintigraphy had a sensitivity of 93%, specificity of 91%, accuracy of 91%, a positive predictive value of 62%, and a negative predictive value of 99%.This study could not confirm that early CT imaging is superior to bone scintigraphy for suspected scaphoid fractures.Bone scanning in the assessment of fractures of the scaphoid.Suspected scaphoid fractures in skeletally immature patients: application of MRI.The purpose of our study was to evaluate the MR findings in the wrists of pediatric patients who have sustained acute wrist injuries and to determine if this imaging method yields more information than combined serial radiographs and physical examinations.Eighteen skeletally immature patients (11 boys and 7 girls, age range 8-15 years) who had presented to the emergency room within 2 days following acute wrist trauma underwent serial clinical, radiographic, and MR examinations if there was a suspicion of a scaphoid fracture.Ten patients had a scaphoid abnormality on MR images. Six had fractures and four had regional bone marrow edema. Initially, all but two fractures were radiographically occult, although the other fractures eventually became evident on later studies. Those with marrow edema did not progress to fractures. Obliteration of the scaphoid fat stripe occurred in five patients with a scaphoid fracture and in six patients who did not have a fracture. Dorsal soft tissue swelling occurred in eight patients, five of whom had scaphoid fractures. Seven patients had evidence of extensor tenosynovitis on MRI.A normal initial MR image had a negative predictive value of 100%. Persistent snuffbox pain may represent injury to the scaphoid, extensor tendons, or dorsal soft tissues. An outcome study evaluating the benefits of early application of MR in the pediatric population is warranted.Detection of occult wrist fractures by quantitative radioscintigraphy: a prospective study on selected patients.To determine the value of quantitative radioscintigraphy (QRS) in the diagnosis of wrist trauma occult fractures.Because of the risk of non-union, the diagnosis of wrist fractures, including scaphoid fractures, is essential but remains difficult despite many imaging modalities. The aim of the study was to assess the benefits of QRS in the diagnosis of occult post-trauma wrist fractures.This prospective study included all patients presenting at the orthopaedic department at Brest University Hospital for wrist pain after trauma with initial normal plain radiographs. Patients with normal radiographs but strongly suspected of fracture underwent QRS consisting of three-phase bone scintigraphy with quantitative analysis. When a fracture was suspected the radiograph and scintigraphy were fused to precisely locate the fracture if the index was higher than 2. If the index was lower than 1.9, fracture was excluded. Between these two indices, other investigations, such as magnetic resonance imaging, were performed. All patients were followed for at least 3 months and reviewed by the same surgeon. Patients underwent a physical examination and possibly other investigations.From April 2006 to July 2008, 87 patients were enrolled (34 women, 53 men; median age 29 years; range, 15-87 years). Among the 46 pathologic bone scintigrams, 55 occult fractures were highlighted. At follow-up, none presented non-union. One had an undetermined QRS. Among the 40 negative results for QRS at follow-up, only one had a non-union. Sensitivity and negative predictive value were 97 and 98%, respectively for carpal fractures.This study highlights the benefit of QRS, which allows the detection of most occult carpal fractures and reduces the risks of complications such as pseudoarthritis.Magnetic resonance imaging versus bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fracture.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) has become increasingly useful in the evaluation of musculoskeletal problems, including those of the wrist. In patients with a wrist injury, MRI is used mainly to assess vascularity of scaphoid non-union. However, the use of MRI in patients in the acute phase following carpal injury is not common. Three-phase bone scintigraphy is routinely performed from at least 72 h after injury in patients with suspected scaphoid fracture and negative initial radiographs. We evaluated MRI in this patient group. The bone scan was used as the reference method. Nineteen patients were included. Bone scintigraphy was performed in all 19 patients, but MRI could be obtained in only 16 (in three patients, MRI was stopped owing to claustrophobia). In five patients, MRI confirmed a scintigraphically suspected scaphoid fracture. In one patient, a perilunar luxation, without a fracture, was seen on MRI, while bone scintigraphy showed a hot spot in the region of the lunate bone, suspected for fracture. This was confirmed by surgery. In two patients, a hot spot in the scaphoid region was suspected for scaphoid fracture, and immobilization and employed for a period of 12 weeks. MRI was negative in both cases; in one of them a scaphoid fracture was retrospectively proven on the initial X-ray series. In another two patients, a hot spot in the region of MCP I was found with a negative MRI. In both, the therapy was adjusted. In the remaining six patients, both modalities were negative. We conclude that in the diagnostic management of patients with suspected scaphoid fracture and negative initial radiographs, the use of MRI may be promising, but is not superior to three-phase bone scintigraphy.Is there a place for radionuclide bone scintigraphy in the management of radiograph-negative scaphoid trauma?To evaluate the role of radionuclide bone scanning in patients with suspected scaphoid trauma, particularly in those with negative radiographs.Prospective. Radionuclide scans and carpal bone radiography were performed on all participants in the early post-injury period.Cape Town tertiary centre trauma unit.Fifty patients who presented with clinical features suggestive of scaphoid trauma.Definitive radiographic diagnosis of fracture or persistent clinical features of scaphoid trauma.All patients who had fractures demonstrated on standard radiography either at the initial visit (13 patients) or at 2 weeks (8 patients) had positive scintiscans (sensitivity 100%). Four of 6 patients who had a positive scan but negative first and second radiographs had persistent tenderness on clinical examination which required extended immobilisation in a plaster cast. The overall positive predictive value of scintigraphy was 93%. All patients with a negative scan were clinically and radiologically negative at 2 weeks (negative predictive value 100%). Evidence of multifocal injury was present in 12 scans, but only 1 radiograph. Thirty-one patients (62%) were scanned within 48 hours of injury.Bone scintigraphy can be used in radiograph-negative scaphoid area injury to exclude the need for further follow-up reliably, but those with positive scans still require clinical examination and radiography at 2 weeks.Value of MR imaging in the detection of occult scaphoid fractures.Bone scintigraphy in the evaluation of fracture of the carpal scaphoid bone.The purpose of the present prospective study was to assess the value of 99m-Tc-MDP wrist scintigraphy performed as a routine examination in excluding or detecting carpal scaphoid bone fracture. The following conclusions are drawn: 99m-Tc-MDP wrist scintigraphy is of high sensitivity, but low specificity in the detection of scaphoid bone fractures. The scintigraphy is expedient to exclude scaphoid bone fracture, if performed after secondary clinical and radiographic assessment, and guided by negative scintigrams a reduction of clinical examinations, radiographies and superfluous casting days is achieved.Can follow-up radiography for acute scaphoid fracture still be considered a valid investigation?To determine whether follow-up radiography is a valid diagnostic investigation in patients with suspected acute scaphoid fractures and normal initial radiographs.Fifty sets of radiographs (initial and follow-up) were independently assessed by four expert observers for the presence or absence of a scaphoid fracture. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), performed in all cases, was used as the gold standard to determine the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the observers' assessment of the follow-up radiograph. In addition, the reliability among observers of the follow-up radiograph was determined by reliability variance analysis.Of the 50 sets of radiographs, 35 patients had a scaphoid fracture and 15 were normal, as established from MRI report. For individual observer's assessment of the follow-up radiograph, sensitivities of 11, 9, 43 and 49%; specificities of 93, 93, 87 and 80%; positive predictive values of 80, 75, 88 and 85%; and negative predictive values of 31, 30, 39 and 40%. A reliability coefficient of more than 60% is needed for a diagnostic test to be considered reliable. Overall, the inter-observer reliability coefficient was 33%, with pair-wise inter-observer coefficients ranging from 18-53%.With poor sensitivity, poor negative predictive value and poor reliability, follow-up radiography cannot be considered a valid diagnostic examination for the detection of scaphoid fracture in patients with normal initial radiographs.[Clinical impact of MRI in acute wrist injuries. Indication and therapeutic consequences].This prospective study was aimed at evaluating the clinical impact of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) vs conventional radiographs in the early diagnosis of acute wrist fractures. The influence of MRI on the period of being unable to work was demonstrated.MRI was performed within a mean of 6.6 days after initial radiographs in 54 patients (56 wrists) with clinical suspicion of wrist fractures and normal plain or indistinct radiographs. MRI findings were read without knowledge of the initial radiographs.In 31 of 56 wrists MRI findings resulted in a change of diagnosis. There was a false positive diagnosis on plain radiographs in nearly one-half ( n=25) of the cases,whereas only six cases had false negative results. In 28 cases MRI allowed the detection of additional injuries of soft tissues. In 35 of 56 cases radiological follow-up was no longer necessary. In 22 of 54 patients the period of immobilization could be shortened or treatment discontinued ( n=18). The period of being unable to work was shortened in 16 of 54 patients, while in 7 of 54 patients this time span had to be prolonged for therapeutic reasons. In 31 of 54 patients MRI-based therapeutic consequences had no influence on the period of being unable to work.Our results show a high clinical impact of MRI in the detection of acute wrist fractures. Early MRI is able to reduce economic costs due to efficient therapeutic treatment and shortened periods of being unable to work. We recommend MRI immediately on the day of trauma in the presence of clinical suspicion and equivocal plain radiographsDiagnosis of occult scaphoid fractures and other wrist injuries. Are repeated clinical examinations and plain radiographs still state of the art?To examine the efficacy of repeated clinical examinations and follow-up radiographs, 121 patients were prospectively and consecutively randomised and clinically followed until a final diagnosis was achieved. All of these patients additionally underwent magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans within an average of 3 days after trauma to control the results of this study. MRI detected 112 injuries in 82 patients (67%). Twenty-eight (25%) of these injuries were scaphoid fractures. There were 15 fractures of other carpal bones, 14 avulsion fractures of extrinsic ligaments (AFL), 26 other bone injuries (fractures of distal radius, fractures of radial styloid, ulnar head fracture metacarpal fracture, bone bruises), and 29 soft tissue injuries (triangular fibro-cartilaginous complex injuries, complete or partial ruptures of the scapholunate ligament, ruptures of the radial collateral ligament, hemarthrosis). By means of repeated clinical examinations and plain scaphoid views, experienced observers were able to detect all the occult scaphoid fractures within 38 days, as well as most of the other fractures about the wrist except one fracture of the triquetrum. Soft tissue injuries, however, were diagnosed only in two cases of complete scapholunate ligament tears. It was further obvious that 70% of all scaphoid fractures and 60% of the AFLs were detected in a review of the initial X-rays by experienced surgeons. Only 30% of all scaphoid fractures detected were really occult and all of these were diagnosed correctly. This prospective study demonstrates that clinical and radiological standard procedures are reliable in the diagnosis of occult fractures of the carpus and wrist when performed by experienced observers. MRI scans are indicated for early diagnosis of occult fractures and soft tissue injuries about the wrist.The usefulness of CT for patients with carpal bone fractures in the emergency department.The wrist is the most commonly injured joint in the body. However, wrist injuries are often missed in the emergency department (ED). If the fracture is not diagnosed and remains untreated, the patient runs a considerable risk of chronic disability. The utility of CT as an aid in the diagnosis of carpal bone fracture was investigated.A retrospective analysis was performed of patients who underwent CT and plain radiography for wrist injury in the ED between March 2003 and February 2006. Plain radiograph interpretations were classified into three groups: (1) the definite fracture group, (2) the no fracture group, and (3) the ambiguous fracture group. The CT results were analysed in relation to the classification of the plain radiograph interpretation. The final diagnoses reviewed from the medical records were used as the reference standard.36 carpal fractures in 33 patients were identified from 45 patients who underwent plain radiography and CT. The interpretations of plain radiographs were classified into definite fractures (n = 10), ambiguous fractures (n = 15) and no fractures (n = 20). When both the definite fracture and ambiguous fracture groups were considered positive, the sensitivity and specificity were 69.7% and 83.3%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of CT scans were both 100%.Emergency physicians should consider CT of the wrist after plain radiography when patients with suspected carpal fracture show normal radiographic findings.[Bone scintigraphy in the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture].Value of bone scintigraphy in patients with carpal trauma.We planned this study to evaluate the role of bone scintigraphy in patients with suspected carpal fracture and normal or suspicious radiographs following carpal injury.Three-phase bone scintigraphy using Tc-99m-MDP was performed on 32 patients with negative radiographs but clinically suspected fracture at two weeks after the trauma. Focally increased radiopharmaceutical uptake was interpreted as a fracture. The final diagnosis was established with clinical follow-up.Twelve (38%) patients had a normal scan excluding fracture. Twelve patients had a single fracture. Multifocal fracture was present in 8 (25%) patients. Eight patients showed scaphoid fractures; of these three showed single scaphoid fracture, and the other five patients revealed accompanying fractures. Distal radius fractures and carpal bone fractures other than scaphoid were both observed in 12 patients. These were eleven fractures of distal radius; three fractures of pisiform; two fractures of hamate; and single fractures of lunate, trapezium and triquetrum. In one patient there was fracture of a first metacarpal bone.In patients with suspected carpal bone fracture and normal or suspicious radiographs, bone scintigraphy can be used as a reliable method to confirm or exclude the presence of a scaphoid fracture and to detect clinically unsuspected fractures of distal radius and other carpal bones.[Occult fractures of the wrist joint: high resolution image magnification roentgen versus MRI].To compare the diagnostic value of high definition macroradiography and MRI in patients with the suspicion of occult wrist fractures.In a prospective study, 23 patients with clinically suspected wrist fractures and normal initial plain radiographs underwent high resolution macroradiography and MR imaging shortly after trauma. Macroradiographs were taken with a microfocus tube using an anode of 0.03-0.3 mm providing a 4x magnification of the wrist, which was obtained in 4 projections. MR images were performed on a 1.0 T MR unit in coronal planes using T1 weighted SE, T2.-weighted 3D GE, and Turbo-STIR sequences. Follow-up radiographs after 6 weeks were used to confirm the diagnosis of a primary occult wrist fracture.Macroradiography depicted 5 wrist fractures: 4 fractures of the scaphoid bone and 1 fracture of the capitate bone. MRI demonstrated 11 fractures (one of them false-positive): 9 fractures of the scaphoid bone and two fractures of the capitate bone. Using macroradiography, the sensitivity for the detection of occult fractures of the wrist was 50% with a specificity of 100%, using MRI the sensitivity was 100% with a specificity of 92%.MRI seems to be superior to high resolution macroradiography in the detection of occult scaphoid fractures and thus is recommended in the management of patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fractures not evident on initial plain films.Radiography and scintigraphy in the diagnosis of carpal scaphoid fractures.Occult scaphoid fractures: comparison of multidetector CT and MR imaging--initial experience.To compare the diagnostic performance of multidetector computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in patients clinically suspected of having a scaphoid fracture and who had normal initial radiographs, with radiographs obtained 6 weeks after trauma as the reference standard.The ethics committee approved the study, and all patients gave written informed consent. Twenty-nine patients (17 male, 12 female; age range, 17-62 years; mean age, 34 years +/- 13) underwent multidetector CT and MR imaging within 6 days after trauma. CT data were obtained with 0.5-mm collimation. For image review, 0.7-mm-thick multiplanar reformations were performed in transverse, coronal, and sagittal planes relative to the wrist. The 1.0-T MR examination consisted of coronal and transverse short inversion time inversion-recovery, coronal and transverse T1-weighted spin-echo, and coronal volume-rendered T2-weighted gradient-echo sequences. Two radiologists analyzed the CT and MR images. A binomial test was used to evaluate the significance of the differences between MR imaging and CT in detection of scaphoid fractures and cortical involvement (P < .05).The 6-week follow-up radiographs depicted a scaphoid fracture in 11 (38%) patients. Eight patients had a cortical fracture, while three patients had only a bandlike lucency within the trabecular portion of the scaphoid. MR imaging depicted all 11 fractures but only three [corrected] cortical fractures. Multidetector CT depicted all eight cortical fractures but failed to depict trabecular fractures. No false-positive fractures were seen on MR or CT images. Differences between MR imaging and CT were not significant for the detection of scaphoid fractures (P = .25) but were significant for cortical involvement (P = .03).Multidetector CT is highly accurate in depicting occult cortical scaphoid fractures but appears inferior to MR imaging in depicting solely trabecular injury. MR imaging is inferior to multidetector CT in depicting cortical involvement.[Bone scintigraphy in suspected fracture of the scaphoid bone].Skeletal scintigraphy of the wrist in suggested scaphoid fracture.Skeletal scintigraphy was performed in 187 patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture but with normal radiographic findings. In 85 patients focally moderately (12 patients) or markedly to intensely (73 patients) increased radionuclide uptake was seen, over either the distal radius or carpal bones. A fracture corresponding to markedly increased uptake was eventually verified in 15 out of 26 patients in the distal radius, in 21 out of 28 in the scaphoid but in only 6 out of 18 in other carpal bones. One fracture of the body and one of the hook of the hamate were found, one fracture of the capitate and three of the triquetrum. Not a single fracture was verified in 10 patients with markedly, often intensely, increased activity over the trapezium/trapezoid. It is concluded that scintigraphy is of value in carpal trauma not only to exclude scaphoid fracture but also to direct the attention to the possibility of other carpal fractures, otherwise usually missed.Diagnostic accuracy of multidetector computed tomography for patients with suspected scaphoid fractures and negative radiographic examinations.The aim of this prospective study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of multidetector computed tomography (MDCT) in detecting occult scaphoid fractures.A total of 54 patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and negative initial conventional radiographs were evaluated with 64-row MDCT wrist examinations within 1 week of the trauma. The gold standard used was the diagnosis on MRI done within 1 week after MDCT. The sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) of MDCT were calculated.MRI showed a total of 22 fractures in 20 of 55 (36%) wrists. Fractures included 14 scaphoid and 8 other carpal bones. MDCT showed a total of 19 fractures in 17 of 55 (30%) wrists. Two isolated scaphoid fractures and one trapezium fracture were missed on MDCT. The sensitivity, specificity, PPV, and NPV of MDCT were 86%, 100%, 100%, and 91%, respectively.MDCT offers highly accurate results, especially concerning cortical involvement, and is a useful alternative in facilities lacking MRI.Clinical utility of tomosynthesis in suspected scaphoid fracture. A pilot study.Radiography alone will not detect all scaphoid fractures. There is a reported prevalence between 9 and 33% of occult scaphoid fractures. The evidence-based literature suggests that magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) is the most suitable secondary imaging modality due to the ability to evaluate the bone marrow directly and to also identify other injuries. However, there is no consensus on the choice of follow-up imaging strategy-computed tomography, MRI, or bone scan-across different institutions. Tomosynthesis is a new digital tomographic method creating multiple thin tomographic sections. The purpose of this study was to evaluate the clinical utility of tomosynthesis in suspected occult fracture.Thirty-five patients with a clinically suspected occult scaphoid fracture after initial normal radiography were imaged with repeat radiography and tomosynthesis scan 2 weeks after trauma.Repeat radiography revealed one previously undetected scaphoid tubercle avulsion and one scaphoid waist fracture, confirmed by tomosynthesis. Tomosynthesis revealed two additional scaphoid waist fractures. In total, three initially occult scaphoid waist fractures were detected (9%). No additional fractures were detected in the remaining 32 patients during a 1-year follow-up.Tomosynthesis can demonstrate occult scaphoid fractures not visible at radiography.Investigation of computed tomographic scan concurrent criterion validity in doubtful scaphoid fracture of the wrist.Rapid diagnosis of scaphoid bone fracture in the wrist is important so that appropriate treatment can be started. If a fracture is clinically suspected without being visible on radiography, further investigation has to be conducted to reveal a fracture or to rule it out. The objective of this study was to investigate the validity of computed tomographic (CT) scanning and bone scintigraphy compared with the clinical fracture rate during follow-up of 1 year for examining patients with a suspected scaphoid fracture.Bone scintigraphy and CT scanning were performed in 29 patients with persistent clinical suspicion of a scaphoid bone fracture 5 to 10 days after trauma.The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of the CT scan were 100%. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values of bone scintigraphy were 78%, 90%, 78%, and 90%, respectively. Seven patients showed a fracture on both CT scanning and bone scintigraphy. Eighteen patients showed no fracture on both CT scanning and bone scintigraphy. A false-positive bone scintigram showed up in two patients and a false-negative bone scintigram in another two patients.CT scanning is a rapid, simple, valid method for demonstrating or ruling out a scaphoid fracture and is superior to bone scintigraphy.Radiographically occult scaphoid fractures: value of MR imaging in detection.To evaluate the diagnostic value of magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fractures and normal initial plain radiographs.MR imaging was performed within 7 days after trauma in 42 patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fractures and normal plain radiographs. T1-weighted spin-echo, T2*-weighted gradient-echo, and short inversion time inversion-recovery (STIR) sequences were performed. MR images were evaluated independently by two radiologists. Six-week follow-up radiographs were used as a standard to diagnose fractures.MR imaging depicted occult fractures of the scaphoid bone in 14 patients (33%), the capitate bone in four (10%), the trapezium in one (2%), and the distal radius in two (5%). All wrist fractures were detected with a combination of STIR and T1-weighted spin-echo sequences. The sensitivity and specificity for detection of radiographically occult fractures of the wrist were 100% each for the first and 95% and 100%, respectively, for the second radiologist with an almost perfect interobserver agreement (K = 0.953).MR imaging has a high sensitivity for detection of fractures of the scaphoid bone and wrist not evident on plain radiographs and may enable early diagnosis and treatment.[MRI in radiologically occult scaphoid fractures. Initial experiences with 1.0 Tesla (whole body-middle field equipment) versus 0.2 Tesla (dedicated low-field equipment)].The study was performed to determine the diagnostic value of different MR systems and field strengths in patients with occult scaphoid and wrist fractures. Twelve patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture but normal plain radiographs were examined by MRI. A dedicated 0.2-T unit (Esaote) and a 1.0-T unit (NT10, Philips) were used. Coronal T1W-SE, STIR, and T2*W-GE sequences were obtained with both systems. Images were evaluated for a bone marrow abnormality, a trabecular or cortical fracture line, and were compared to the 6-week follow-up radiographs. Seven wrist fractures were found at 0.2 T and 1.0 T, proven in the follow-up radiographs. A bone marrow abnormality was present in all seven fractures on both systems. Trabecular and cortical fracture lines were visualized at 0.2 T in four cases and at 1.0 T in seven cases. Low-field MR imaging at 0.2 T and mid-field MR imaging at 1.0 T seem to be equivalent in the diagnosis of a fracture in radiographically occult scaphoid and wrist fractures. In the visualization of fracture details, important for therapeutic and prognostic considerations, 1.0 T seems to be superior.Use of early magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of occult scaphoid fractures: the CAST Study (Canberra Area Scaphoid Trial).To establish the effectiveness of early magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture in patients with suggestive clinical findings (but a normal initial X-ray) in an Australian major-referral emergency departmentA prospective study of patients who presented within 24 hours after trauma with clinical findings suggestive of a scaphoid fracture but no evidence of fracture on the initial X-ray. MRI was performed within 24 hours of presentation. Clinical review in patients with normal initial MRI was carried out in 10 days and repeat MRI was carried out when clinically indicated.A total of 22 patients were enrolled. Early MRI within 24 hours revealed 6 scaphoid fractures, 2 distal radial fractures and a hamate fracture. Thirteen patients had no fracture on the initial MRI. Upon clinical review in 10 days, 5 of these patients were clinically cleared and discharged. Eight of these patients underwent repeat MRI none of which revealed a fracture.In an Australian tertiary hospital with MRI facility, the early use of MRI is a sensitive and practical way to diagnose occult scaphoid fractures and saves unnecessary immobilisation.Outcome of routine bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.Undisplaced scaphoid fractures are easily missed on conventional scaphoid radiographs, but these occult fractures may seriously impair hand function. Routine bone scintigraphy (BS) is often advocated if there are clinical signs of a scaphoid fracture without radiological evidence. However, the results require careful therapeutic management.To determine the diagnostic value of BS in daily practice for clinically suspected scaphoid fractures.We evaluated our protocol of routine BS in suspected scaphoid fractures.In a retrospective study, we analysed 111 consecutive cases with signs of a scaphoid fracture on physical examination. Radiographs revealed 55 fractures, the remaining 56 patients all underwent BS.On average, the BS was performed after 4 days. It showed a fracture in 38/56 of the patients. The distribution of fractures was: scaphoid bone 15, distal radius 11, other carpal bones 9 and metacarpal bones 3.If there is a strong clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture, which cannot be confirmed by conventional radiology, BS is a valuable diagnostic tool.Bone scintigraphy in the management of X-ray-negative potential scaphoid fractures.One hundred and eleven patients with signs and symptoms of carpal scaphoid injury, but with no fracture visible on X-ray, underwent bone scintigraphy of the wrists. The first 42 patients were re-X-rayed 10 days after injury: bone scanning had identified all fractures confirmed on this X-ray; there were no false negative bone scans. Sixty-seven patients (60%) did not have increased focal uptake over the scaphoid or distal radius, and were mobilised immediately. None of these had a fracture at follow up. Twenty-nine patients with increased uptake over the scaphoid area (26%) remained in plaster of Paris for 6 weeks. All of these had clinical signs of a scaphoid injury. Bone scanning is a practical investigation for all X-ray-negative potential scaphoid injuries, and is acceptable to patient and clinician. In the presence of a normal scan, the practice of re-X-raying patients 10 days after injury may be abandoned.MR imaging of clinically suspected scaphoid fractures.The purpose of this study was to evaluate the usefulness of MR imaging in revealing occult fractures in patients with clinically suspected acute scaphoid fractures who have normal or equivocal findings on radiographs.Thirty-six patients underwent MR imaging within 7 days of wrist injury. All had physical findings suggestive of scaphoid fracture. Coronal T1-weighted, short inversion time inversion recovery, and either T2-weighted or proton density-weighted fast spin-echo sequences with fat suppression were used. Follow-up radiographs were obtained at least 2 weeks after MR imaging whenever possible. All imaging studies were reviewed by two musculoskeletal radiologists.MR imaging revealed 22 occult fractures in 20 patients. Thirteen of these 22 fractures were in the scaphoid bone, and nine were in the distal radius. On MR images, 16 patients had no evidence of fracture. Follow-up radiographs were available in 14 of the 20 patients who had occult fracture revealed by MR imaging. Eleven of the 13 occult fractures of the scaphoid bone were followed up (two were lost to follow-up), and 10 of the 11 showed signs of healing. Five of the nine lesions of the distal radius were followed up, and three of these showed evidence of healing fracture. Three patients without MR evidence of a fracture had follow-up radiographs that showed no fracture. Three patients had findings consistent with bone contusion on MR images; in two patients, the contusion was associated with other fractures, and in one patient, the contusion was isolated.MR imaging can reveal occult wrist fractures when findings on radiographs are normal or equivocal.Bone scanning of fractures of the scaphoid.The value of isotope scanning in patients with clinical signs of fracture of the carpal scaphoid bone and negative or non-diagnostic initial radiographs was examined. 30 patients were examined using both radiography and isotope scanning. A normal scan excludes a fracture. Increased activity localized to the scaphoid bone indicates a fracture. 9 patients had fracture of the scaphoid evident on bone scans within 2 weeks of the injury. It took 2-6 weeks before these fractures showed up on radiographs.[Imaging diagnostics of the wrist: MRI and Arthrography/Arthro-CT].To evaluate the use of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) compared with arthrography and arthro-CT (AG/ACT) in patients with wrist pain.MRI and arthrography/arthro-CT (AG/ACT) of the wrist joint were retrospectively evaluated in 346 patients over a three-year period. Imaging findings were correlated to surgical results (n = 78) or clinical course in an at least 6-month follow-up.For tears of the triangular fibrocartilage, arthrography, arthro-CT, and MRI demonstrated a sensitivity and specificity of more than 0.96. Only the positive predictive value was superior for arthrography/arthro-CT (0.99 and 0.98, respectively) compared with MRI (0.94). Arthrography was superior for functional diagnosis of scapho-lunate ligament tears (n = 25). Ulno-lunate and ulno-triquetral ligament defects were demonstrated more exactly by arthrography. Traumatic osseous defects, particularly scaphoid fractures (n = 33) and avascular necrosis (n = 17), were better diagnosed using MRI.For suspected lesions of the triangular fibrocartilage complex, AG/ACT is slightly more reliable than MRI. However, MRI was found to be highly accurate in diagnosing TFC tears, and is superior to AG/ACT in detecting traumatic and vascular lesions of the wrist.Significance of a hot spot on the bone scan after carpal injury--evaluation by computed tomography.The use of bone scintigraphy in patients with negative radiographs after carpal injury is widely advocated. However, focally increased activity on the bone scan in the scaphoid or other carpal bones cannot always be radiologically confirmed as a fracture. To confirm scintigraphically suspected carpal fractures, computed tomography (CT) of the wrist was performed in patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and initially negative radiographs. All patients underwent plain radiography, bone scintigraphy and CT. The combination of plain radiographs and CT, as judged by a panel of experienced observers, was used as the reference standard. In 18 patients, 21 out of 22 carpal hot spots on bone scintigraphy could be radiologically confirmed as a fracture. The diagnosis was missed by CT scan in three patients with proven fractures on plain radiographs. We conclude that, in patients with negative initial radiographs following carpal injury, a positive bone scan must be interpreted as a fracture.A comparison of bone scintigraphy and MRI in the early diagnosis of the occult scaphoid waist fracture.To determine the accuracy of MRI in the assessment of the radiographically occult scaphoid fracture.This prospective study compared the sensitivity and specificity of MRI for detection of radiographically occult scaphoid fractures with bone scintigraphy (BS), the currently accepted imaging modality of choice. Consecutive patients with clinical signs of a scaphoid injury but no evidence of fracture on plain radiographs at presentation and after 7-10 days were evaluated by MRI and BS. All images were reported in masked fashion and the sensitivities and specificities of the imaging modalities determined. All patients with a scaphoid fracture demonstrated by MRI or BS were followed for at least a year after injury.Forty-three subjects (aged 12-74 years) had both MRI and BS carried out on average 19 days from the injury date.Six patients (14%) had scaphoid waist fractures. There were other bony injuries in a further six. In 40 patients there was agreement between the BS and MRI findings. In three cases there was discrepancy between the imaging modalities; in all three MRI was found to be the more sensitive and specific. MRI could become the investigation of choice for this injury.Computed tomography of suspected scaphoid fractures.Computed tomography (CT) can be used to triage suspected scaphoid fractures. This study assessed intraobserver and interobserver reliability and positive and negative predictive values of CT for the diagnosis of a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture.Eight observers evaluated CT scans from 30 patients (13 with nondisplaced scaphoid fractures, 17 with no scaphoid fractures) for the presence or absence of a fracture. Five observers evaluated the scans a second time. Statistical analyses included intraobserver and interobserver reliability and diagnostic characteristics.Computed tomography had substantial intraobserver and interobserver reliability for the diagnosis of a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture. The average sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy of CT for a nondisplaced scaphoid fracture were 89%, 91%, and 90% for the first round and 97%, 85%, and 88% for the second round of observations, respectively. Based on an estimated prevalence of 5% true fractures among patients with suspected scaphoid fractures, the average positive predictive value for the detection of radiographically occult scaphoid fractures with tomography of the wrist was 0.28. The average negative predictive value was 0.99.Computed tomography should be used with caution for triage of nondisplaced scaphoid fractures because false-positive results occur, perhaps from misinterpretation of vascular foraminae or other normal lines in the scaphoid. Given the relative infrequency of true fractures among patients with suspected scaphoid fractures, CT is better for ruling out a fracture than for ruling one in.Bone scintigraphy in patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture.CT of the wrist in suspected scaphoid fracture.Bone scan and sagittal projection CT of the scaphoid was performed in 10 patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fractures. The primary and follow-up plain radiographs were negative or equivocal for fracture. CT examination demonstrated scaphoid fracture in 7 patients and normal findings in 3. It is concluded that CT of the scaphoid can replace bone scan to diagnose or rule out fracture in institutions where nuclear medicine facilities are not available.Magnetic resonance imaging of occult scaphoid fractures.Occult fractures of the scaphoid bone occur frequently and may lead to nonunions. In a prospective blind study, we performed magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) examinations on 32 patients who had sustained a wrist injury and in whom a scaphoid fracture was clinically suspected, but could not be confirmed on the original set of two routine and four scaphoid view radiographs. The MRI examinations were performed an average time of 2.8 days after the trauma. This prospective study proved that MRI is able to diagnose occult scaphoid fractures without delay and without the use of radioactive diagnostic means. Sensitivity and specificity of MRI were 100%. This conventional method could save $7,200 (US) per 100,000 inhabitants in providing an immediate and correct diagnosis and avoiding unnecessary cast immobilization. Additional injuries that may be misdiagnosed by conventional radiographs are also detected with a specificity and sensitivity of 100%.A prospective comparison for suspected scaphoid fractures: bone scintigraphy versus clinical outcome.Early diagnosis and treatment of scaphoid fractures limits the number of delayed and non-unions. Bone scintigraphy proved to be a sensitive diagnostic tool for the detection of occult scaphoid fractures. However, the results have to be interpreted with care.To prospectively correlate the results of bone scintigraphy with clinical outcome.In a prospective study, we analysed 50 consecutive patients with signs of a scaphoid fracture at physical examination but no evidence of a scaphoid fracture on scaphoid radiographs. All patients had a protocolised follow up at fixed intervals. The clinical outcome was defined according to a standardised algorithm.Bone scintigraphy revealed 32% (16/50) occult scaphoid fractures and 40% (20/50) occult other fractures. Clinical outcome proved that bone scintigraphy was false positive in five patients and in one case false negative for a scaphoid fracture.Bone scintigraphy in combination with protocolised physical examination is the gold standard for patients with signs of a scaphoid fracture that cannot be proven on scaphoid radiographs.[Possibilities of scintigraphy in the early diagnosis of fracture of the scaphoid bone in the hand].Early computerized tomography accurately determines the presence or absence of scaphoid and other fractures.To validate the use of early CT in predicting scaphoid fracture and other fractures in patients with suspected scaphoid fracture.A prospective observational study of adult patients with a diagnosis of clinical scaphoid fracture presenting to a regional ED. Patients were immobilized in a scaphoid plaster and had a CT (wrist and carpals) same or next day. The gold standard used was the diagnosis on Day 10 with clinical examination and X-rays, with MRI performed in patients with persistent tenderness but normal X-rays.Forty-seven patients completed the study protocol from September 2004 until February 2006. For all fractures, early CT had a 96.8% negative predictive value and 100% positive predictive value (94.4% sensitive, 100% specific). No scaphoid fracture was missed by early CT. One patient had a trapezium fracture on CT, with a coexistent subtle capitate fracture only detected on MRI.Early CT scans show promise in the diagnosis of scaphoid and other fractures of the wrist and carpals. Further study is warranted to validate early CT in clinical scaphoid fracture as an alternative to other early advanced imaging, or plaster immobilization and 2 week review.[Value of bone scintigraphy in the recognition of scaphoid bone fracture difficult to detect roentgenologically].Fractures result in increased metabolism of the bone and increased uptake of certain radioisotopes as demonstrated by bone scanning. By comparison, X-rays reveal a fracture only by a disturbance in skeletal structure. In this study, scaphoid fractures which were difficult to detect initially on X-rays were demonstrated by bone scan eight days later. The value of this diagnostic technique was demonstrated in several cases.[MRI scanning in suspected fractures of the scaphoid bone].MR examination was performed in 20 patients clinically suspected of having a fracture of the scaphoid bone. The patients also followed the normal routine with conventional radiographs in the acute fase and after 10-12 days. The MR was in most cases performed within a day after the trauma. All fractures seen on conventional radiographs were depicted on MR. MR further showed four fractures, five bone contusions (bone bruise) and lesions of the soft tissues in 75% of the patients. In patients with suspected fracture of the scaphoid, MR seems to be the best primary imaging method and displays a wide range of lesions.Early magnetic resonance imaging compared with bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.We evaluated 100 consecutive patients with a suspected scaphoid fracture but without evidence of a fracture on plain radiographs using MRI within 24 hours of injury, and bone scintigraphy three to five days after injury. The reference standard for a true radiologically-occult scaphoid fracture was either a diagnosis of fracture on both MRI and bone scintigraphy, or, in the case of discrepancy, clinical and/or radiological evidence of a fracture. MRI revealed 16 scaphoid and 24 other fractures. Bone scintigraphy showed 28 scaphoid and 40 other fractures. According to the reference standard there were 20 scaphoid fractures. MRI was falsely negative for scaphoid fracture in four patients and bone scintigraphy falsely positive in eight. MRI had a sensitivity of 80% and a specificity of 100%. Bone scintigraphy had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 90%. This study did not confirm that early, short-sequence MRI was superior to bone scintigraphy for the diagnosis of a suspected scaphoid fracture. Bone scintigraphy remains a highly sensitive and reasonably specific investigation for the diagnosis of an occult scaphoid fracture.[Contribution of quantitative radio-scintigraphy to diagnosis of wrist injuries undetected on plain films: a prospective study of 154 cases].Fractures of the scaphoid must be diagnosed quickly to avoid persistent nonunion and the risk of osteoarthritis. Despite meticulous physical examination and adequate x-ray detection, numerous occult fractures still go unrecognized. The aim of this prospective study was to analyze the pertinence of quantitative radio-scintigraphy (QRS) presently used for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures.Quantitative radio-scintigraphy (QRS) is a new imaging technique associating quantitative bone scan and numerical fusion between bone scan images and x-ray images. We conducted a prospective study between November 1994 and March 1999 to evaluate the pertinence of this examination technique for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures in patients presenting clinical symptoms suggestive of wrist fracture but whose plain x-rays were initially considered normal. Further some patients had several series of plain x-rays performed at several week intervals in order to search for fractures becoming progressively visible on plain x-rays. After the QRS data was acquired, these patients' x-rays were reviewed again. We also compared the cost of QRS, repeated x-rays, bone scan and MRI at the Besançon University Hospital.QRS was performed in all 154 patients and revealed 61 fractures (56 single-line and 5 multiple-line fractures). Thus 43.5% of these patients had occult wrist fractures (41% of which involved the carpal scaphoid).Occult fracture of the wrist, particularly the carpal scaphoid, is frequent. Repeated x-ray examination does not increase the rate of detection of these fractures. Bone scans may also fail to reveal occult fractures. MRI is a key examination in the assessment of wrist fracture symptoms, but is presently not available in all institutions. Bone scan is classically insufficiently precise. QRS is a rapidly available low-cost examination which we have found to be indispensable for the diagnosis of occult wrist fractures. With early QRS diagnosis, the risk of neglected carpal scaphoid fracture and subsequent nonunion and osteoarthritis together with the personal, social, and medicolegal consequences can be avoided.Determining the presence of scaphoid fracture with a day 4 bone scan.MRI diagnosis of fracture of the scaphoid bone: impact of a new practice where the images are read by radiographers.To investigate whether magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) radiographers are able to evaluate MRI examinations with regard to scaphoid fractures to save patients unnecessary immobilization and clinical and radiographic examinations, and to reduce the costs for the hospital as well as society in general.Over a 1-year period 224 consecutive patients with a suspected clinical scaphoid fracture but negative radiography were referred for MRI and examined within 11 hours. The MR images were primarily evaluated by the MRI radiographer on duty. Other fractures and bone edema were not reported because these were not part of the work-up protocol agreed upon by the radiology and the orthopedic departments. The following weekday a final report was provided by a radiologist. For the economical analysis the official price-list for Danish hospital service was used.The MRI radiographers reported 43 scaphoid fractures, whereas the radiologist ultimately diagnosed only 36 scaphoid fractures (16.1% of patients) (sensitivity, 100%; specificity, 96.3%). Six of the seven false-positive fractures occurred in patients with edema of the scaphoid. The seventh false-positive was a fracture of the capitate. The hospital saved at least 20,000 and the social care system 70.000.It is possible to provide an acute MRI service to patients with clinically suspected fracture of the scaphoid and a normal plain radiograph. The MR images can be primarily read by sufficiently trained MR radiographers. This new work-up protocol reduces the cost for society.[Prospective comparison of MRI vs. direct magnification radiography in occult fractures of the scaphoid bone].The diagnosis of occult fractures of the scaphoid bone is even more challenging than that of conventional fractures of the scaphoid. This study aimed to compare prospectively the gold standard method (plain radiographs in four projections, after about 14 days) and the primary findings with direct magnification radiography (DIMA) and magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). Primary MRI showed much higher diagnostic power than plain radiography at 10-14 days in occult scaphoid fractures and in detection of associated carpal injuries. This may lead to a decreasing time of disease. DIMA was inferior in detecting occult fractures of the scaphoid.Diagnosis of scaphoid fracture and dedicated extremity MRI.We evaluated the value of dedicated extremity magnetic resonance imaging (E-MRI) in patients with clinical suspicion of a scaphoid fracture and normal initial radiographs. 52 patients underwent E-MRI within a mean of 4 (2-10) days after trauma. Follow-up radiographs were performed at average 11 (8-14) weeks after trauma, and these images were used as the "gold standard". A T1-weighted turbo gradient echo 3D and a tau short inversion recovery STIR were performed, both in coronal planes. The imaging time was less than 10 min. The images were evaluated independently by two radiologists. E-MRI detected occult fractures of the scaphoid in 9 patients, and of the distal radius in a further 6 patients. All these fractures were confirmed at follow-up radiographs. Furthermore, E-MRI revealed a fracture of the capitate bone in 1 patient, and of the triquetrum in 2 patients, and in 8 patients, bone bruise in 1 or more of the carpal bones. However, these fractures and bone lesions could not be confirmed by the follow-up radiographs. The agreement between the two examiners was high (kappa = 0.8) for E-MRI detection of fractures. E-MRI seems to be better than radiographs in the early diagnosis of occult fractures of the scaphoid bone and the wrist.Clinically suspected scaphoid fracture: a comparison of magnetic resonance imaging and bone scintigraphy.59 patients with clinical suspicion of scaphoid fracture, but negative radiographs at presentation and review, were examined by magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and bone scintigraphy (BS). The diagnoses were compared with subsequent follow-up. There were four scaphoid fractures, 10 other fractures and three significant ligamentous injuries. All scaphoid fractures were identified by MRI and BS. MRI showed better interobserver agreement for scaphoid injury than BS and fewer false positive reports. Significant ligamentous injury and carpal instability diagnosed by MRI were not evident on scintigraphy. Using fast scanning protocols, the cost of MRI is comparable with that of BS. MRI should be considered as the appropriate second line investigation in these clinical circumstances.Magnetic resonance imaging of suspected scaphoid fractures using a low field dedicated extremity MR system.To determine whether magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) using a dedicated extremity system could be utilized for the routine assessment of patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture, and to determine the most cost-effective timing of MRI for these patients.MRI of the wrist using a 0.2T extremity MR system was performed in two groups of patients. Fifty-six patients were examined within 4 days of injury and 53 with persistent symptoms at 10 days to 6 weeks following injury. A scaphoid series of radiographs was negative in both groups.The early MR group had seven scaphoid, six radial and four other fractures. Management was altered in 89%. The late MR group had 14 scaphoid, nine radial and three other fractures. Management was altered in 69%. A cost model showed that overall costs are less with early rather than late scanning.MRI of the wrist when scaphoid fracture is suspected can be undertaken in all patients with negative radiographs and could be performed in most departments with an MRI machine. There are significant patient benefits and overall costs would change little from conventional practice.Can a day 4 bone scan accurately determine the presence or absence of scaphoid fracture?To evaluate the accuracy of day 4 bone scans in predicting the presence or absence of fracture in patients with "clinical scaphoid fracture."Prospective sensitivity study of ED patients with clinical scaphoid fractures. Each patient was immobilized in a thumb spica cast and had day 4 bone scans of both wrists and hands. Blinded day 4 bone scan results were ultimately compared with the diagnosis on day 14 when patients returned for repeat clinical examination and radiographs. In cases of equivocal radiographic or clinical examination results, a day 14 bone scan was performed.Two tertiary care teaching hospital emergency departments.All ED patients older than 16 years with the diagnosis of clinical scaphoid fracture were eligible.Ninety-nine patients were enrolled and successfully completed the study protocol from October 1990 through November 1992. One patient had bilateral injury, for a total of 100 completed studies. Day 4 bone scans were 100% sensitive and 92% specific, for a positive predictive value of 65%, a negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 93% (95% confidence interval, 88%, to 98%). Many other types of fractures were identified on the day 4 scans, including those of the triquetra, distal radius, capitate, hamate, trapezoid, trapezium, and metacarpals.Day 4 bone scans are an accurate means of ruling out scaphoid fracture. However, because of a significant number of false-positive scans at day 4, they do not reliably confirm the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture. The bone scans also permitted identification of several other wrist fractures that had not been radiographically apparent.A comparative analysis of the accuracy, diagnostic uncertainty and cost of imaging modalities in suspected scaphoid fractures.Clinical examination of suspected scaphoid fractures is sensitive, but not specific, and initial plain radiographs lack sensitivity. A variety of second-line imaging techniques have been proposed to improve immediate diagnosis and reduce overtreatment. Different sample populations and methods of reporting test performance have made side-by-side comparison difficult. The aim of this study is to describe the epidemiology of clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and determine the prevalence of true fracture. These data are used to compare second-line imaging techniques in our population.200 consecutive patients attending a trauma service with clinically suspected scaphoid fracture were followed through diagnosis to discharge.The prevalence of true fracture was 16% and was associated with male sex and injury playing sport. Magnetic resonance imaging has the best diagnostic performance, with the added benefit of soft tissue evaluation, but was the most expensive option. Ultrasound examination was least effective in detecting true fractures.Future studies should further evaluate the clinical and economic sequelae of overtreatment of suspected fractures. Clinicians should examine alternatives to "empirical" treatment without definite diagnosis based on their local facilities and patient demographics.[Occult fractures of the carpal navicular. Detection by quantitative radioscintigraphy. Social and medico-legal repercussions].Fractures of the scaphoid of the wrist are not easily diagnosed and when they are eventually recognized due to late complications, the prognosis is much poorer than it would have been at injury. Medical negligence and poorly-performed or interpreted x-rays are frequently cited as reasons for non-diagnosis. Often these fractures are trabecular, so-called occult, and they cannot be seen on a conventional exam, even if well-performed. Tomography and tomodensitometry have yielded poor results. Quantitative radioscintigraphy (QRS), the exam we are proposing, is a modification of scintigraphy, which is a very sensitive exam (100%) but has little specificity. The first step in QRS is to quantify the fixation of the tracer on the injured side and compare it to that of the uninjured side. If the injured side fixation is double that of the uninjured side, a fracture (often scaphoid) is present. MRI is our reference. In the second step in QRS, a computer-assisted fusion is made of the scintigraphic image and the x-ray (quantitative scintigraphy has the same diagnostic value as MRI). The center of the fracture is localized, thus yielding a specificity of nearly 100% for this exam. Out of a prospective series of 154 patients who had a conventional examination: 41% were diagnosed to have a scaphoid fracture using QSR, therefore a number higher than supposed. Rare carpal fractures were also detected. The cost of this exam is low. The exam climinates non-diagnosed fractures which can lead to non-union and arthrosis. Due to the frequency of carpal trauma, this exam should have a significant effect on the individual, on social security costs and litigations.Early computed tomography compared with bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fractures.This study examined whether multidetector computed tomography (CT) is superior to bone scintigraphy for diagnosis of an occult scaphoid fracture.In a study period of 22 months, 100 consecutive patients with a clinically suspected scaphoid fracture and no fracture on scaphoid radiographs, were evaluated with CT within 24 hours after injury and bone scintigraphy between 3 and 5 days after injury. The reference standard for a true (radiographic occult) scaphoid fracture was either (1) diagnosis of fracture on both CT and bone scintigraphy or (2) in case of discrepancy, clinical and/or radiographic evidence of a fracture during follow-up.CT showed 10 scaphoid and 18 other fractures. Bone scintigraphy showed 21 scaphoid and 36 other fractures. According to the reference standard, there were 14 scaphoid fractures. CT had a sensitivity of 64%, specificity of 99%, accuracy of 94%, a positive predictive value of 90%, and a negative predictive value of 94%. Bone scintigraphy had a sensitivity of 93%, specificity of 91%, accuracy of 91%, a positive predictive value of 62%, and a negative predictive value of 99%.This study could not confirm that early CT imaging is superior to bone scintigraphy for suspected scaphoid fractures.Bone scanning in the assessment of fractures of the scaphoid.Suspected scaphoid fractures in skeletally immature patients: application of MRI.The purpose of our study was to evaluate the MR findings in the wrists of pediatric patients who have sustained acute wrist injuries and to determine if this imaging method yields more information than combined serial radiographs and physical examinations.Eighteen skeletally immature patients (11 boys and 7 girls, age range 8-15 years) who had presented to the emergency room within 2 days following acute wrist trauma underwent serial clinical, radiographic, and MR examinations if there was a suspicion of a scaphoid fracture.Ten patients had a scaphoid abnormality on MR images. Six had fractures and four had regional bone marrow edema. Initially, all but two fractures were radiographically occult, although the other fractures eventually became evident on later studies. Those with marrow edema did not progress to fractures. Obliteration of the scaphoid fat stripe occurred in five patients with a scaphoid fracture and in six patients who did not have a fracture. Dorsal soft tissue swelling occurred in eight patients, five of whom had scaphoid fractures. Seven patients had evidence of extensor tenosynovitis on MRI.A normal initial MR image had a negative predictive value of 100%. Persistent snuffbox pain may represent injury to the scaphoid, extensor tendons, or dorsal soft tissues. An outcome study evaluating the benefits of early application of MR in the pediatric population is warranted.Detection of occult wrist fractures by quantitative radioscintigraphy: a prospective study on selected patients.To determine the value of quantitative radioscintigraphy (QRS) in the diagnosis of wrist trauma occult fractures.Because of the risk of non-union, the diagnosis of wrist fractures, including scaphoid fractures, is essential but remains difficult despite many imaging modalities. The aim of the study was to assess the benefits of QRS in the diagnosis of occult post-trauma wrist fractures.This prospective study included all patients presenting at the orthopaedic department at Brest University Hospital for wrist pain after trauma with initial normal plain radiographs. Patients with normal radiographs but strongly suspected of fracture underwent QRS consisting of three-phase bone scintigraphy with quantitative analysis. When a fracture was suspected the radiograph and scintigraphy were fused to precisely locate the fracture if the index was higher than 2. If the index was lower than 1.9, fracture was excluded. Between these two indices, other investigations, such as magnetic resonance imaging, were performed. All patients were followed for at least 3 months and reviewed by the same surgeon. Patients underwent a physical examination and possibly other investigations.From April 2006 to July 2008, 87 patients were enrolled (34 women, 53 men; median age 29 years; range, 15-87 years). Among the 46 pathologic bone scintigrams, 55 occult fractures were highlighted. At follow-up, none presented non-union. One had an undetermined QRS. Among the 40 negative results for QRS at follow-up, only one had a non-union. Sensitivity and negative predictive value were 97 and 98%, respectively for carpal fractures.This study highlights the benefit of QRS, which allows the detection of most occult carpal fractures and reduces the risks of complications such as pseudoarthritis.Magnetic resonance imaging versus bone scintigraphy in suspected scaphoid fracture.Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) has become increasingly useful in the evaluation of musculoskeletal problems, including those of the wrist. In patients with a wrist injury, MRI is used mainly to assess vascularity of scaphoid non-union. However, the use of MRI in patients in the acute phase following carpal injury is not common. Three-phase bone scintigraphy is routinely performed from at least 72 h after injury in patients with suspected scaphoid fracture and negative initial radiographs. We evaluated MRI in this patient group. The bone scan was used as the reference method. Nineteen patients were included. Bone scintigraphy was performed in all 19 patients, but MRI could be obtained in only 16 (in three patients, MRI was stopped owing to claustrophobia). In five patients, MRI confirmed a scintigraphically suspected scaphoid fracture. In one patient, a perilunar luxation, without a fracture, was seen on MRI, while bone scintigraphy showed a hot spot in the region of the lunate bone, suspected for fracture. This was confirmed by surgery. In two patients, a hot spot in the scaphoid region was suspected for scaphoid fracture, and immobilization and employed for a period of 12 weeks. MRI was negative in both cases; in one of them a scaphoid fracture was retrospectively proven on the initial X-ray series. In another two patients, a hot spot in the region of MCP I was found with a negative MRI. In both, the therapy was adjusted. In the remaining six patients, both modalities were negative. We conclude that in the diagnostic management of patients with suspected scaphoid fracture and negative initial radiographs, the use of MRI may be promising, but is not superior to three-phase bone scintigraphy.Is there a place for radionuclide bone scintigraphy in the management of radiograph-negative scaphoid trauma?To evaluate the role of radionuclide bone scanning in patients with suspected scaphoid trauma, particularly in those with negative radiographs.Prospective. Radionuclide scans and carpal bone radiography were performed on all participants in the early post-injury period.Cape Town tertiary centre trauma unit.Fifty patients who presented with clinical features suggestive of scaphoid trauma.Definitive radiographic diagnosis of fracture or persistent clinical features of scaphoid trauma.All patients who had fractures demonstrated on standard radiography either at the initial visit (13 patients) or at 2 weeks (8 patients) had positive scintiscans (sensitivity 100%). Four of 6 patients who had a positive scan but negative first and second radiographs had persistent tenderness on clinical examination which required extended immobilisation in a plaster cast. The overall positive predictive value of scintigraphy was 93%. All patients with a negative scan were clinically and radiologically negative at 2 weeks (negative predictive value 100%). Evidence of multifocal injury was present in 12 scans, but only 1 radiograph. Thirty-one patients (62%) were scanned within 48 hours of injury.Bone scintigraphy can be used in radiograph-negative scaphoid area injury to exclude the need for further follow-up reliably, but those with positive scans still require clinical examination and radiography at 2 weeks.Value of MR imaging in the detection of occult scaphoid fractures.Bone scintigraphy in the evaluation of fracture of the carpal scaphoid bone.The purpose of the present prospective study was to assess the value of 99m-Tc-MDP wrist scintigraphy performed as a routine examination in excluding or detecting carpal scaphoid bone fracture. The following conclusions are drawn: 99m-Tc-MDP wrist scintigraphy is of high sensitivity, but low specificity in the detection of scaphoid bone fractures. The scintigraphy is expedient to exclude scaphoid bone fracture, if performed after secondary clinical and radiographic assessment, and guided by negative scintigrams a reduction of clinical examinations, radiographies and superfluous casting days is achieved.Can follow-up radiography for acute scaphoid fracture still be considered a valid investigation?To determine whether follow-up radiography is a valid diagnostic investigation in patients with suspected acute scaphoid fractures and normal initial radiographs.Fifty sets of radiographs (initial and follow-up) were independently assessed by four expert observers for the presence or absence of a scaphoid fracture. Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), performed in all cases, was used as the gold standard to determine the sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of the observers' assessment of the follow-up radiograph. In addition, the reliability among observers of the follow-up radiograph was determined by reliability variance analysis.Of the 50 sets of radiographs, 35 patients had a scaphoid fracture and 15 were normal, as established from MRI report. For individual observer's assessment of the follow-up radiograph, sensitivities of 11, 9, 43 and 49%; specificities of 93, 93, 87 and 80%; positive predictive values of 80, 75, 88 and 85%; and negative predictive values of 31, 30, 39 and 40%. A reliability coefficient of more than 60% is needed for a diagnostic test to be considered reliable. Overall, the inter-observer reliability coefficient was 33%, with pair-wise inter-observer coefficients ranging from 18-53%.With poor sensitivity, poor negative predictive value and poor reliability, follow-up radiography cannot be considered a valid diagnostic examination for the detection of scaphoid fracture in patients with normal initial radiographs.[Clinical impact of MRI in acute wrist injuries. Indication and therapeutic consequences].This prospective study was aimed at evaluating the clinical impact of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) vs conventional radiographs in the early diagnosis of acute wrist fractures. The influence of MRI on the period of being unable to work was demonstrated.MRI was performed within a mean of 6.6 days after initial radiographs in 54 patients (56 wrists) with clinical suspicion of wrist fractures and normal plain or indistinct radiographs. MRI findings were read without knowledge of the initial radiographs.In 31 of 56 wrists MRI findings resulted in a change of diagnosis. There was a false positive diagnosis on plain radiographs in nearly one-half ( n=25) of the cases,whereas only six cases had false negative results. In 28 cases MRI allowed the detection of additional injuries of soft tissues. In 35 of 56 cases radiological follow-up was no longer necessary. In 22 of 54 patients the period of immobilization could be shortened or treatment discontinued ( n=18). The period of being unable to work was shortened in 16 of 54 patients, while in 7 of 54 patients this time span had to be prolonged for therapeutic reasons. In 31 of 54 patients MRI-based therapeutic consequences had no influence on the period of being unable to work.Our results show a high clinical impact of MRI in the detection of acute wrist fractures. Early MRI is able to reduce economic costs due to efficient therapeutic treatment and shortened periods of being unable to work. We recommend MRI immediately on the day of trauma in the presence of clinical suspicion and equivocal plain radiographsDiagnosis of occult scaphoid fractures and other wrist injuries. Are repeated clinical examinations and plain radiographs still state of the art?To examine the efficacy of repeated clinical examinations and follow-up radiographs, 121 patients were prospectively and consecutively randomised and clinically followed until a final diagnosis was achieved. All of these patients additionally underwent magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans within an average of 3 days after trauma to control the results of this study. MRI detected 112 injuries in 82 patients (67%). Twenty-eight (25%) of these injuries were scaphoid fractures. There were 15 fractures of other carpal bones, 14 avulsion fractures of extrinsic ligaments (AFL), 26 other bone injuries (fractures of distal radius, fractures of radial styloid, ulnar head fracture metacarpal fracture, bone bruises), and 29 soft tissue injuries (triangular fibro-cartilaginous complex injuries, complete or partial ruptures of the scapholunate ligament, ruptures of the radial collateral ligament, hemarthrosis). By means of repeated clinical examinations and plain scaphoid views, experienced observers were able to detect all the occult scaphoid fractures within 38 days, as well as most of the other fractures about the wrist except one fracture of the triquetrum. Soft tissue injuries, however, were diagnosed only in two cases of complete scapholunate ligament tears. It was further obvious that 70% of all scaphoid fractures and 60% of the AFLs were detected in a review of the initial X-rays by experienced surgeons. Only 30% of all scaphoid fractures detected were really occult and all of these were diagnosed correctly. This prospective study demonstrates that clinical and radiological standard procedures are reliable in the diagnosis of occult fractures of the carpus and wrist when performed by experienced observers. MRI scans are indicated for early diagnosis of occult fractures and soft tissue injuries about the wrist.The usefulness of CT for patients with carpal bone fractures in the emergency department.The wrist is the most commonly injured joint in the body. However, wrist injuries are often missed in the emergency department (ED). If the fracture is not diagnosed and remains untreated, the patient runs a considerable risk of chronic disability. The utility of CT as an aid in the diagnosis of carpal bone fracture was investigated.A retrospective analysis was performed of patients who underwent CT and plain radiography for wrist injury in the ED between March 2003 and February 2006. Plain radiograph interpretations were classified into three groups: (1) the definite fracture group, (2) the no fracture group, and (3) the ambiguous fracture group. The CT results were analysed in relation to the classification of the plain radiograph interpretation. The final diagnoses reviewed from the medical records were used as the reference standard.36 carpal fractures in 33 patients were identified from 45 patients who underwent plain radiography and CT. The interpretations of plain radiographs were classified into definite fractures (n = 10), ambiguous fractures (n = 15) and no fractures (n = 20). When both the definite fracture and ambiguous fracture groups were considered positive, the sensitivity and specificity were 69.7% and 83.3%, respectively. The sensitivity and specificity of CT scans were both 100%.Emergency physicians should consider CT of the wrist after plain radiography when patients with suspected carpal fracture show normal radiographic findings.[Bone scintigraphy in the diagnosis of scaphoid fracture].Value of bone scintigraphy in patients with carpal trauma.We planned this study to evaluate the role of bone scintigraphy in patients with suspected carpal fracture and normal or suspicious radiographs following carpal injury.Three-phase bone scintigraphy using Tc-99m-MDP was performed on 32 patients with negative radiographs but clinically suspected fracture at two weeks after the trauma. Focally increased radiopharmaceutical uptake was interpreted as a fracture. The final diagnosis was established with clinical follow-up.Twelve (38%) patients had a normal scan excluding fracture. Twelve patients had a single fracture. Multifocal fracture was present in 8 (25%) patients. Eight patients showed scaphoid fractures; of these three showed single scaphoid fracture, and the other five patients revealed accompanying fractures. Distal radius fractures and carpal bone fractures other than scaphoid were both observed in 12 patients. These were eleven fractures of distal radius; three fractures of pisiform; two fractures of hamate; and single fractures of lunate, trapezium and triquetrum. In one patient there was fracture of a first metacarpal bone.In patients with suspected carpal bone fracture and normal or suspicious radiographs, bone scintigraphy can be used as a reliable method to confirm or exclude the presence of a scaphoid fracture and to detect clinically unsuspected fractures of distal radius and other carpal bones.[Occult fractures of the wrist joint: high resolution image magnification roentgen versus MRI].To compare the diagnostic value of high definition macroradiography and MRI in patients with the suspicion of occult wrist fractures.In a prospective study, 23 patients with clinically suspected wrist fractures and normal initial plain radiographs underwent high resolution macroradiography and MR imaging shortly after trauma. Macroradiographs were taken with a microfocus tube using an anode of 0.03-0.3 mm providing a 4x magnification of the wrist, which was obtained in 4 projections. MR images were performed on a 1.0 T MR unit in coronal planes using T1 weighted SE, T2.-weighted 3D GE, and Turbo-STIR sequences. Follow-up radiographs after 6 weeks were used to confirm the diagnosis of a primary occult wrist fracture.Macroradiography depicted 5 wrist fractures: 4 fractures of the scaphoid bone and 1 fracture of the capitate bone. MRI demonstrated 11 fractures (one of them false-positive): 9 fractures of the scaphoid bone and two fractures of the capitate bone. Using macroradiography, the sensitivity for the detection of occult fractures of the wrist was 50% with a specificity of 100%, using MRI the sensitivity was 100% with a specificity of 92%.MRI seems to be superior to high resolution macroradiography in the detection of occult scaphoid fractures and thus is recommended in the management of patients with clinically suspected scaphoid fractures not evident on initial plain films.Radiography and scintigraphy in the diagnosis of carpal scaphoid fractures.Occult scaphoid fractures: comparison of multidetector CT and MR imaging--initial experience.To compare the diagnostic performance of multidetector computed tomography (CT) and magnetic resonance (MR) imaging in patients clinically suspected of having a scaphoid fracture and who had normal initial radiographs, with radiographs obtained 6 weeks after trauma as the reference standard.The ethics committee approved the study, and all patients gave written informed consent. Twenty-nine patients (17 male, 12 female; age range, 17-62 years; mean age, 34 years +/- 13) underwent multidetector CT and MR imaging within 6 days after trauma. CT data were obtained with 0.5-mm collimation. For image review, 0.7-mm-thick multiplanar reformations were performed in transverse, coronal, and sagittal planes relative to the wrist. The 1.0-T MR examination consisted of coronal and transverse short inversion time inversion-recovery, coronal and transverse T1-weighted spin-echo, and coronal volume-rendered T2-weighted gradient-echo sequences. Two radiologists analyzed the CT and MR images. A binomial test was used to evaluate the significance of the differences between MR imaging and CT in detection of scaphoid fractures and cortical involvement (P < .05).The 6-week follow-up radiographs depicted a scaphoid fracture in 11 (38%) patients. Eight patients had a cortical fracture, while three patients had only a bandlike lucency within the trabecular portion of the scaphoid. MR imaging depicted all 11 fractures but only three [corrected] cortical fractures. Multidetector CT depicted all eight cortical fractures but failed to depict trabecular fractures. No false-positive fractures were seen on MR or CT images. Differences between MR imaging and CT were not significant for the detection of scaphoid fractures (P = .25) but were significant for cortical involvement (P = .03).Multidetector CT is highly accurate in depicting occult cortical scaphoid fractures but appears inferior to MR imaging in depicting solely trabecular injury. MR imaging is inferior to multidetector CT in depicting cortical involvement.